'^- 



I 



iM'""^ 



PERKINS LIBRARY 

JJuke University 



Kare iJooks 



Digitized by the Internet Archive 
in 2011 with funding from 
Duke University Libraries 



http://www.archive.org/details/somereflectionsuOOaste 



BOOKS written by the fame Author^ 
and fold ^^ William Parker, at 
the King's'Head in St. haul's Church- 
Yard. 



HE CHRISTIAN RELIGION, asPro- 

fefs'd by a D a u g h t e r of the Church of 
Eyigland. The Third Edition. 
Shewing, the due Behaviour of Women-, the Vices 
they ought to Shun^ and the Virtues they ought to 
Pra&ice. A Treatife very neceirary, in this dege- 
nerate Age, to confirm the Ladies in iheir 'Reli- 
gious Prir/cifksy and to inftrudt them in what they 
ought to beliei-e and pra&ife, in order to their 
'Eternal Salvation. 

A Serious Proposal to the Ladies for the 
Advancement of their true and greateji Intereft, 
Part I. The Fourth Edition. 

A Serious Propos al to the Ladies, Part II. 
Wherein a Method is offered for the Improvement 
of their Minds. 

Letters concerning the Love of God, 
between the Author of the Propofal to the Ladiesy 
and Mr. John Norris : Wherein his late Difcourfe, 
Ihewing, diat it ought to be intire and exclufive of all 
other Loves, is farther cleared and juftificd. The 
fecond Edition. 

An Enquiry after Wit: Wherein the tri- 
fling Arguing, and impious Raillery of the late Earl of 
Shaftsbury-, in his Letter concerning Enthufiafm:^ 
and other profane Writers, are fully Anfwcr'd and 
juftly Expofed. The Second Edition. 

Moderation truly ftated : Or a Review of a 
late Pamphlet, intided, Moderation a Vertue. With 
a Prefatory Difcourfe to Dr. Ifyive^iant, concern- 
ing his late EfTayson Peace and War. /i^to. 



SOME 



REFLECTIONS 



UPON 



MARRIAGE 



With Additions. 



The FOURTH EDITION. 




LONDON: 

Printed for W i l 1. 1 a m P a r k e R, at the 
Kings Head in St. Paul's Church- Yard. 

M.DCC.XXX. 




.^ 



:? i 



ADVERTISEMENT. 




HESE Reflexions being 
made in the Country^ 'where 
the Book that occajiond 
them came but late to Hand, the 
Reader is dejird to excufe their 
Unfeafonahlenefs as well as other 
Faults 5 and to believe^ that they 
have no other Dejign than to Cor^ 
reH feme Ahufes^ which are not the 
lefs hecaufi Tower a?id Trefeription 
feem to authorize them. If any is 
fe needkjly curious as to inquire from 

what 



44C440 



Al^VERTISEMENT. 

fwloat Hand they come^ they may 
pleafe to know, that it is not good 
Manners to asky Jince the 'Title 
Vage does not tell them : We are all 
of us fiifficiently Vain^ and 'without 
doubt J the celebrated Name of Au- 
thor, which mojl arefo fond of had 
not been avoided hut for very good 
Reafons : To name but one ^ Who 
will care to pull upon themfelves 
an Hornet's Nefl: ? 'Tis a very great 
Faulty to regard rather Who it is 
that fpeaksy than What is fpoken 5 
and either to fubmit to Authority^ 
when we floould only yield to Rea^ 
fon 5 or if Reafon prefs too hard, to 
think to ward it off by T^er final Ob^ 
je6fions and Reflexions. Bold Truths 
may pafs while the Speaker is In- 
cognito, but are feldom endurd 
when he is known 5 few Minds be' 

ing 



Adv ertisement. 
ing (irong enough to hear ^hat cori" 
t radios their Principles and ^rac" 
ticeSj ^without recriminating when 
they can. And though to tell the 
Truth he the mojl Friendly Office^ 
yet whofoever is fa hardy as to ven^ 
ture at it^ Jloall he counted an Enemy 
forfo doing. 

The Preface in the Lift Edition 
being extended to an uncommon 
Length, is now printed at the lat- 
ter End, as an Appendix. 



E KK At A. 

Page II. line if. read^owr^ p. 14. 1. f. r.fufficient., p. zi. 
1. 10. dele in that; p. 97. 1. 10. after opfofe add /* ; 
p. 130. 1.6. r. Adulterer y — 1. 23. v. humbled, p. 131. 
1. 2. for than read as; p. 1^6. \. 14. for was r, is. 



44CM0 



Booh Sold hy W. Parker.^ 



A Rchbifhop Sharp's Sermons. 4 Vols. 
•**■ Bifhop Moor's Sermons. 2 Vols. 

A Colleftion of above three hundred Receipts in 
Cookery, Phyfick, and Surger)', for the Ufe of all 
good Wives, tender Mothers, and careful Nurfes. 
By feveral Hands. The Fourth Edition : To which 
is added, a fecond Part, containing a great Number 
of excellent Receipts, for Preferving and Conferving 
of Sweet-Meats, crc. 

A Differtation of the Extreme FoUy and Danger 
of Infideli-v ; occafioncd by a late virulent Book, 
intitled, A Difcourfc on the Grounds and Reafons 
of the Chriflian Religion. By Thomas Curteis^ 
Redor of Wrotham in K.ent. Second Edition. 
Pr. 2x. 

An Inquiry whether a general Pradice of Virtue 
tends to the Wealth or Poverty, Benefit or Advan- 
tage of a People ? In which the Pleas offered by the 
Author of the Fable of the Bees, cr. Private Vices, 
Publick Benefits, for the Ufetulnefs of Vice and 
Roguery, are confidered \ with fome Thought? 
concerning a Toleration of Publick Stews. By the 
late Mr. Bluett. Pr. 2 s. 6d. 

The Hiftory of the Life and Sufferings of the Re- 
verend and Learned John WkkliW-, D. D. Warden 
of Canterbury Hall, and Publick ProfefTor of Divi- 
nity in Oxford^ and Reftor of Lutterivorth in JLe/"- 
ceflerjhire^ in the Reign of King Edward III. and 
Richard the II. j together with a Colledion of Papers 
relating to the faid Hiftory, never before Printed. 
By John Levjis, M. A. Minifter o( Margate in Kent. 

The Church Catechifm explained for the Ufe of 
the Diocefe of St. yifaph. By the Right Reverend 
Father in God PFUl. Beverrdge, D. D. late BilTiop 
of St. Afaph. Sixdi Edition. 

The Faith and Pradice of the Omxchoi England- 
Man. The Ninch Edition. Price ^d. 

Principles of the Cyprianic Age, with Regard to 
Epifcopal Power and Jurifdidion, aflerted and re- 
commended from the genuine Writings of St. Cy* 
Man liimfelf, and his Contemporaries. 




SOME 



REFLECTIONS 



UPON 



MARRIAGE. 




URIOSITY, which is 
lometimes an Occafion of 
Good, but more frequent- 
ly of Mifchief, by difturb- 
ing our own or our Neigh- 
bours Repofe, having induced me to read 
the Account of an unhappy Marriage, 
I thought an Afternoon w^ould not be 
quite thiown away in purfuing fuch 
Reflexions as it occafion'd. I am far 
from defigning a Satire upon Marriage, 
as fome pretend, either unkindly or 
B igno- 



Reflections 

Ignorant! y, through want of Rejle^ton 
in that Senfe wherein I ufe the Word. 

One wou*d have thought that Cardi- 
nal Mazarim^ whofe Dignity, Power 
and Riches, rendered him fo confidera- 
ble in the Eyes of all Europe ; and who, 
like moft great Minifters, aim'd at no- 
thing ib much as the aggrandizing him- 
felf and his Family, and who wanted 
no Opportunities of doing it, Ihould 
have taken his Meafures fo juftly as not 
to be difappointed : At leaft, that a Fa- 
brick rais'd with fo much Art and Coft, 
founded in the Oppreflion, and cement- 
ed with the Blood of the People, fhould 
not fo quickly have tumbled into the 
Duft after him. But fo it is, Providence, 
whether we think of it or no, over- 
rules our Anions and baffles our beft- 
concerted Projects : So that unlefs wc 
wilfully Ihut our Eyes, we cannot but 
difcern, that when Meji in Power and 
Honour leave God out of their Schemes, 
they have jio Under pandtng^ though their 
natural Genius be ever fo bright^ hut 

are 



upon Marriage. i 

are jilftly compared to the Beajis that pe^ 
rijh. The Ignorant and Fooli/lp fucceed 
quite as well as the fVorldly-ivife^ who 
carry nothing away with them when they 
die, neither will their Riches and Glory 
defcend as they intended. It is only by 
generous and worthy Adions that we 
are refcued from Oblivion, or from what 
is worfe, being remembred with Con- 
tempt and Execrations : So little Reafoa 
is there to envy any Man's Wealth and 
Greatnels, but much to emulate their 
Wifdoni and Vertue whofe Views extend 
to a more durable Felicity. 



'T I s natural to wetl-turn'd Minds^ 
when they hear of any Pcrfon eminent 
in Wit and Beauty, adorn'd with Politc- 
nefs and Addrels, to wilh thefe may be 
accompanied and fupported by what is 
more valuable and laftiog, folid Senfe and 
real Yertue. One grieves at any Imputa- 
tion on fuch an engaging Charader, 
and if one cannot always find the favou- 
rite Perfon fortunate, one labours for 
the Confolation of finding them difcreet; 
B 0, and 



Reflections 

and even where their Condud is not 
wholly blamelefs, CornpafTion and Good- 
nature will take Place of Cenfure in a 
Noble, as well as in a Chriftian Heart. 
We find out fomething to excufe, fome- 
thing to regret, lamenting that fiich a 
Treafure fhould fall into unworthy 
Hands, infenlible of its Value, unskilful 
to preferve and improve it: We figh, 
we grieve, that any Perfon capable of 
being an Ornament to a Family, and Blef^ 
fing to the Age, Ihould only ferve as an 
unhappy Shipwreck to point out the 
Misfortune of an ill Education and un- 
fuitable Marriage, and the inexprefiiblc 
Danger of feeking Confolation and Relief, 
in any thing but Innocence and Vertue. 

They only who have felt it, know the 
Mifery of being forcM to marry where 
they do not love ; of being yok'd for 
Life to a difagreeable Perfon and impe- 
rious Temper, where Ignorance and Fol- 
ly (the Ingredients of a Coxcomb, who 
is the moft unfufFcrable Fool) tyrannizes 
over Wit and Senfe ; To be perpetual- 



upon Marriage. 
ly contradicted for ContradicHon-falve, 
and bore down by Aiithoritv, not by 
Argument ; to be denied one's moft in- 
nocent Defires, for no other Realon but 
the abfblute Will and Pleafure of a Lord 
and Mafter, whofe Follies a Wife, with 
all her Prudence, cannot hide, .^nd whole 
Commands fhe cannot but delpife at the 
fame Time that fhe obeys them. 

• Or, fuppofe on the other Hand, fne 
has married the Man fhe loves, hcap'd 
upon him the higheft Obligations, by 
putting into his Power the Fortune he 
coveted, the Beauty he profefs'd to adore j 
how foon are the Tables turn'd > It is 
her Part now to court and fawn j his 
real or pretended Pailion foon cools into 
Indifference, Ncglcd, or perhaps Aver- 
{ion. 'Tis well if he prefervcs a de- 
cent Civility, takes a little care of Ap- 
pearances, and is willing to conceal his 
Breach of faith. 

But lliall a Wife retaliate? God 

forbid ! no Provocation, though ever fo 

B 3 great. 



Reflect loMs 
great, can excufe the Sin, or lefTen the 
Folly : It were indeed a revenging the 
Injury upon herfelf jn the moft terrible 
Manner. The Italian Proverb ihews a 
much, better Way, If you would be re-, 
venged of your EncmieSy live well. 

Devotion is the proper Remedy, 
and the only infallible Relief in all Di- 
ftrefTes ; when this is negleded or turn'd 
into Ridicule, we run, as from one Wic- 
kednefs, io from one Misfortune, to an- 
other. Unhappy is that Grandeur which 
is too great to be good, and that which 
fets us at a Diftance from true Wifdom. 
Even Bigotry, as contemptible as it is, 
is preferable to profane Wit ; for that 
requires our Pity, but this deferves our 
Abhorrence. 

A Woman who fecks Confolation 
under Domeftick Troubles from the 
Gaieties of a Court, from' Gallantry, 
Gaming, rambling in Search of odd Ad- 
ventures, childifh, ridiculous and ill- 
natur'd Amufements, fuch as we find in 

;he 



iip07i Marriage. 
the unhappy Madam M — 's MemotrSy 
the common Methods of getting rid of 
Time, that is, of our very Being, and 
keeping as much as we can at a Diftancc 
from ourfelvcs, will find thcfc are very 
infignificant Applications ; they hardly 
skin the Wound, and can never heal it, 
they even hurt, they make it feftcr, 
and render it almoft incurable. 

What an ill Figure docs a Woman 
make, with all the Charms of her Beau- 
ty, and Sprightlinefs of her Wit, with 
all her good Humour and infinuating 
Addrefs, though fhe be the beft Oecono- 
mift in the World, the mofl: entertain- 
ing Company, if (he remit her Guard, 
abate in the Severity of her Caution, and 
Striitnefs of her Vertue? If fhe neglects 
thofc Methods which arc necelhiry to 
keep her, not only from a Crime, but 
from the very Sufpicion of one? She 
juftifies the Injury her Husband has done 
her, by publifhing to the World, that 
whatever good Qualities Ihe may pof^ 
fefs, Difcrction, the Miftrcfs of all the 
B 4 Tcft, 



8 Reflections 

reft, is wanting : Though fhe be really 
guiltlefs, fhe cannot prove her Innocence, 
the Sufpicions in her Prejudice are fo 
ftrong. When fhe is cenlur'd, Charity, 
that thinks no Evil, can only be filent ; 
though it believes and hopes the beft, 
it cannot engage in her Defence, nor 
apologize for irregular Actions. 

A N ill Husband may deprive a Wife 
of the Comfort and Quiet of her Life, 
give occafion of exercifing her Vertue, 
try her Patience and Fortitude to the 
iitmofb, which is all he can do; it is 
herfelf only that can accompliih her 
Ruin. 

I N vain we feek for Colours to var- 
nifii faulty Manners. An Advocate 
ihews the bell Side of his Wit, but 
the worft of his Integrity when he has 
an ill Caufe to manage: But to what Pur- 
pof? ? He cannot inipofe on the Judicious, 
his Colouring vanillics before their Eyes, 
. and a good deal of Malice, with a very 
little Senfe, will find the Weaknefs of 

his 



upon Marriage. 
his Arguments; fo much the more fiifpe- 
ded, by how much the more laboured : 
For Truth is plain and forcible, depend- 
ing on her own Strength ; fhe requires 
no more than to be placed in a proper 
Light, nor condefcends to Art or Infi- 
nuations, unlefs in Compaffion to the 
Weaknei's and Prejudice of Mankind. 
Nor are they lefs miftaken in regard of 
"Wit, which confifts not meerly in faying 
what is odd and out of the way ; Fools 
do this pretty often ; but Wit confifts in 
exprefling good Senfe in a furpridng, 
yet natural and agreeable Manner. 

There are fome Reafons, (for the 
Laws of God and Man allow Divorces 
in certain Cafes) though not many, that 
authorize a \\ ife*s leaving her Husband, 
but if any Thing fhort of abfolute Ne- 
ceflity, from irreclaimable Vice and Cru- 
elty, prevails with her to break thefe 
facred and ftrongeft Bonds, how is fhe 
expos'd to Temptations and Injuries, 
Contempt, and the juft Cenfure of the 
World. A Woman of Senfe, one fliou'd 

think, 



10 Reflections 

think, could take but little Pleafurc in 
the Courtfhip and Flatteries of her Ado- 
rers, even when Ihe is fingle : But for a 
married Woman to admit of Love Ad- 
dreifes, is woriethan FolLy; it is a Crime 
fo ridiculous, that I will never believe a 
Woman of Senfe can be guilty of it. 
For what does a Man pretend when he 
whines and dangles after a married Wo-^ 
man ? Would he have her think he ad-^ 
mires her, when he is treating her with 
the laft Contempt ? or that he loves her, 
when he is trying his Arts to gratify his 
brutal Paflion, at the Price of all that is 
dear to her ? His line Speeches have 
either no Meaning, or a reproachful 
one ; he affronts her Underftanding as 
well as her Vertue, if he fancies Ihc can- 
not difcern, or wants Spirit to refent the 
Infults. She can look on him no other-i- 
wife than as the worft of Hypocrites, 
who flatters to betray, and fawns that 
he may ruin ; who is laying Snares to 
entangle her in a Commerce founded on 
Injuftice, and Breach of the molt facred 
Vows, carried on by Diilimulation, 

Treachery^ 



up07i Marriage. \\ 

Treachery, Lyes, and Deceit, attended 
with Fear and Anxiety, Shame, Re- 
niorfe, the bitter Stings of Guilt, whole 
fatal Confequences cannot be forefeen, 
the Icaft of which is the blafting of her 
Honour. And why all this Mifchief ? 
Why, bccaufe he profelTcs to think her 
amiable, and with the blacked: Trea- 
chery takes Advaiitage of her Weakncfs, 
and the too good Opinion fhe has enter- 
tained of him, to render her odious ! 
to render her contemptible to himfelf, as 
well as to the World. 

Who would be that unhappy Per- 
fon with all her Grandeur, Wit an4 
Beauty, who gave Occafion to thcfe Re- 
Jietiions ? Who would live fo infamoufly, 
and die {o miferably ? Wha;)£ver Apo- 
logies the Interfiled may invent, what 
they call Gallantry will find a harlhcr 
Name with the Modeft and Difcrcet* 
Or elfe Gallantry, under whatever Form, 
niuft pafs for a fcandalous Amufement, 
not to be allow'd among Perfons of Ver- 
tue and Honour. It is indeed ridicu- 
lous 



12 Reflections 

lous to talk of hartnlefs Gallantry; there 
is, there can be no fuch Thing : For 
befides the Umbrage and Scandal, a 
Chriftian muft be pure in Heart and 
Eyes ; ihe who has vovv'd her AfFedions 
to one, and is his Property, cannot with- 
out Injuftice, and even Perjury, parcel 
them out to more. 

I T is in Diftempers of the Mind as in 
thofe of the Body, a little Care and 
Prudence will prevent what requires a 
long and difficult Regimen to cure : 
Therefore in both Cafes the Aphorifm 
holds ; R^Jlft the Beginnings • be early 
on our Guard. There was a Time when 
the moll abandoned Sinner would have 
fhrunk with Horror, at what by De- 
grees becomes familiar, and, as they fan- 
cy, natural. The Sap is carryM on 
againft Vertue as artfully as againft a 
fortified Town, and the Approaches are 
as methodical : But in this the Cafe is 
different, the Befieged cannot fly; where- 
as Vertue is beft fecured by avoiding 
the Enemy. They are fenfiblc of this, 

and 



upon Marriage^ ij 

and therefore nothing more common 
than that filly Maxim, Ihaf Vertue is 
not Fertile till it has been tried. This is 
a Mortar-piece that has done more Exe- 
cution than all their other Arts^ for Self- 
confidence is always a Prelude to Deftru- 
6tion. The Wife who liftens to Admi- 
rers runs into Temptation, and fports up- 
on a Precipice. For, as a noble Lord, 
who knew the World perfectly well, 
inftruds his Daughter, flie may as well 
play with Fire, as dally with Gallantry. 
I can fay nothing fo well upon this Sub- 
jed, as what is writ by this noble Au- 
thor, whom therefore I beg leave to 
tranlcribe : 

** The ExtravagcVicies of tl: ^ Age 
" have made Caution more neceflfary ^ 
" and by the fame Reafon that the too 
" great Licence of ill Men, hath by 
" Confequence in many I'hings rcftrain^ 
" ed the lawful Liberty of thofe who 
" did not abufe it, the unjuftifiable 
" Freedom of feme of your Sex, have 
<f involved the reft in the Penalty of be- 

" ing 



^4 Reflectiom^ 

" ing reduced. And though this caft* 
" not fo alter the Nature of Things, as 
" to make that Criminal^ which in it 
" felf is Indifferent ; yet if it maketh it 
" da^jgerouj, that alone is infufficient to 
" juftify the Refiraintt. A clofe Beha- 
*' vtour is the fitteft to receive Vertue 
" for its conftant Giieji^ becaufe there,.- 
" and there only, it can be fecure. Pro- 
*' per Referves are the Outworks, and 
" mull fiever be deferted by thofe who 
*' intend to keep the Place ; they keep 
*' off the Poflibility not only of being 
" take??., but of being attempted ; and if 
" a Woman feeth Danger at never fo re- 
" mote a Diftance, fhe is for that Time 
" to Ihorten her Line of Liberty : She 
" who will allow her felf to go to the 
" utmoji Extents of every thing that is 
" lawful^ is Ho very near going further, 
" that thofe who lie at watch, will be- 
" gin to count upon her. 

*< Mankind, from the double Temp- 
^* tation of Faulty and Dejire^ is apt to 
" turn every thing a }Voman doth to 

" the 



upon Marriage. tj 

*' the hopeful Side'^ and there are few 
*' who dare make an impudent Appli- 
" cation, till they difcern fomething 
" which they are willing to take for an 
*' Rncourageimnt : It is fafer therefore to 
** prevent fuch Forwardnefs^ than to go 
" about to cure it : It gathercth Strength 
" by the firft Allowances^ and claimeth 
" a Right from having been at any Time 
" fuffcred with Impunity : Therefore 
" nothing is with more Care to be 
" avoided, than fuch a kind of CiviUty 
'' as may be miftakcn for Invitation. " 

I N the Time of Yore a Knave was no 
more than a Servant, and polTibly a Gal" 
lant might originally denote a wcll- 
drefs'd Coxcomb, who had nothing clfc 
to do but to make Parade of his Wit and 
Cloaths, and perhaps of his Valour in 
Tournament, to gain the general Admi- 
ration of the Ladies, and the Honour 
of openly profefhng with Refped and Di- 
ftance, his Veneration for fome celebra- 
ted Beauty, or Woman of Merit. But 
modern Gallantry is quite a different 

Bufinefs ; 



%6 Reflections 

Bufinefs : The Gallant, the fine Gentle- 
man in Town, far fuperior to him upon 
the Road and all his Undergraduates, in 
carrying on his Plot, in the artful Contri- 
vance of his Defign, and Dexterity in 
executing it, happily combines the Cun- 
ning of the Fox, and the Audacity of the 
Tyger. Cruel indeed ! for he tears the 
Fame, worries the Vertue, and compleats 
the Deftrudion of his unhappy Prey. 
'Tis well for him that Ghriftianity as yet 
prevails among us, for this obliges its 
Votaries to forgive the higheft Injuries : 
Should the Morality of the honeft Hea- 
then, which fonie are pleas'd to profels, 
but not to pradife, beccme the Falhion, 
or the old Englifh Spirit, which has 
done and lufFered fo much for Liberty 
and Property, revive among us, alas ! 
what would become of the pretty Fel- 
lows ? Would they not run the Rifque of 
being taken for Wolves, or Savages, 
have a Price fet on their Heads, and be 
exterminated at any rate, that fo among 
rational Perfons we might be elleem'd a 
civilized Nation ? 

2 These 



upon Marriage. xy 

These Deftroyers avoided, and bet- 
ter Care taken than ufual in Womens 
Education, Marriage might recover the 
Dignity and Felicity of its original In- 
ftitutien ; and Men be very happy in a 
married State, if it be not their own 
Fault* The great Author of our Be- 
ing, who does nothing in vain, ordain- 
ed it as the only honourable Way of 
continuing our Race ; as a Diftinclion 
between rcafonable Creatures and meer 
Animals, into which we degrade our 
felves, by forfaking the Divine Inftitu- 
tion. God ordained it for a BleHing, 
not a Curfe : We are foolilh as well as 
wicked, when that which was appoint- 
ed for mutual Comfort and Afliftance, 
has quite contrary EfFcd through our 
Folly and Perverfenefs. Marriage there- 
fore, notwithftanding all the loofe Talk 
of the Town, the Satires of antient, or 
modern Pretenders to Wit, will never 
lofe its juft Efteem from the Wife and 
Good. 

G Though 



i8 Reflections 

Though much may be faid againli 
this, or that Match ; though the Ridicu- 
loufnefs of fome, the Wickednefs of 
others, and the Imprudence of too many, 
may provoke our Wonder, or Scorn, 
our Indignation or Pity j yet Marriage 
in general is too facred to be treated with 
Difrelped, too venerable to be the Sub- 
jeft of Raillery and Buffoonery. None 
but the Impious will pretend to refine 
on a Divine Inflitution, or fuppofe there 
is a better Way for Society and Pofteri- 
ty. Whoever Icoffs at this, and by odi- 
ous Reprefentation would polTels the 
married Pair with a frightful Idea of each 
other, as if a Wife is nothing better than 
a Domeftick Devil, an Evil he muft to- 
lerate for his Conveniency ; and an Hus- 
band muft of neceflity be a Tyrant or a 
Dupe ; has ill Defigns on both, and is 
himfelf a dangerous Enemy to the Pub- 
lick, as well as to private Families. 

But upon what are the Satires againft 
Marriage grounded ? Not upon the State 

it 



upon Marriage. Ijf 

it felf, if they are juft, but upon the ill 
Choice, or foolifh Conduct of thole who 
are in it ? and what has Marriage confi- 
der'd in it felf to do with thefe ? When 
the Blame is laid where it ought to be, 
hot Marriage, but inordinate Paflionj 
Raftinefs, Humour, Pride, Covetouf- 
nefs, Inconftancy, unjuft vSulpicions, un*' 
hecelTary Severity, and, in a Word, a 
filly, vicious, imprudent Choice^ or Gon» 
dud, ought to be arraign'd. For why 
fhould Marriage be exclaimed againft 
when Men reap the Fruit of their owri 
Folly ? If they will put an unequal 
Yoke upon their own Necks, they have 
their Choice, who can they blame for it^ 
If inftead of a Help and Comfort, their 
Courtfhip has procured them a Plague 
and Difgrace, who may they thank but 
themfclves : A Man can never be under 
any fort of Obligation to marry againft 
his Liking, but through fomc reigning 
Vice, or want of Fortitude. 

Could there be no happy Marriages^ 
Arguments againft Matrimony might 

C i h^^^ 



20 Reflections 

have their Weight with the Reafonablc 
as well as the Licentious. But fince the 
Laws of G o D and Man, founded upon 
Rcafbn and Experience, forbid a Tem- 
porary Contract, and engage the mar- 
ried Pair for Life, it is not only pollible, 
but highly probable, and not without 
many eminent Inftances, that there are 
and may be, happy Marriages ; provided 
we ad reafonably in our Choice and 
Condud, acquit our felves like wiie 
Men and Chriftians. So that all we have 
to fay againft Matrimony, ieems only 
to Ihew the Levity, or Impiety of our 
own Minds : It is no more than a Flou- 
lifh of Wit, and how prettily foever we 
may talk, it is but little to the Purpofe. 

I s it the being tied to One that of- 
fends us ? Why this ought rather to re- 
commend it to us, and would really do 
fo, were we guided by Reafon, and 
not by Humour or brutifli Paffion. He 
who does not make Friendfhip the chief 
Inducement to his Choice, and prefer it 
before any other Gonfideration, does not 

deferve 



upon Marriage. 21 

deferve a good Wife, and therefore 
fhould not complain if he goes without 
one. Now we can never grow weary 
of our Friends ; the longer we have had 
them the more they are endear'd to us ^ 
and if we have One well aflur'd, we 
need feek no farther, but are fufHciently 
happy in her. The Love of Variety in 
this and in other Cafes, fhcvvs only the 
ill Temper of our own Mind in that- 
for inftead of being content with a com- 
petent Share of Good, thankfully and 
chearfully enjoying what is afforded us, 
and patiently bearing with the Inconve- 
niencies that attend it, wc would fct 
up our Reft here, and exped Felicity 
where it is not to be found. 

The Chriftian Inftitution of Marri- 
age provides the bcft that may be for 
Domeftick Quiet and Content, and for 
the Education of Children ; fo that if 
we were not under the Tie of Religion, 
even the Good of Society and civil Duty, 
would oblige us to what Chrillianity re- 
q[uires : And fince the very beft of us 
C 3 arc 



%z Reflections 

arc but poor frail Creatures, full of Igr 
norance and Infirmity, fo that in Juftice 
we ought to tolerate each other, and exr 
ercife that Patience towards our Compa- 
nions to Day, which we fliall give them 
occafion to fhew towards us To-morrow ; 
the more we are accuflom'd to any one's 
Converfation, the better fliall we under^ 
ftand their Humour, be more able to 
comply with their Weaknefs, and Icfs 
offended at it. For he who would have 
every one fubmit to his Humours, and 
ivill not in his Turn comply with them,, 
(though we fhould fuppofe him always 
in the right, whereas a Man of this Tem- 
per very feldom is fo) is not fit for a 
Husband, fcarce fit for Society, but 
ought to be turn'd out of the Herd as 
an unrcafonablc Creature. 

There n;ay indeed be Inconvenien-r 
cies in a married Life ; but is there any 
Condition without them ? And he who 
lives fingle, that he may indulge Licen- 
poufncfs and give up himfelf tothe Con- 
duct of wild and. ungovern*d Defires, (or 

indeed 



upon Marriage. zj 

indeed out of any other Inducement, than 
the Glory of God and the Good of his 
Soul, through the Profped he has of 
doing more Good, or becaufc his Frame 
and Difpofition of Mind are more fit for 
a fingle than a married Life) may rail as 
he pleafes againft Matrimony, but can 
never juftify his own Condud, nor clear 
it from the Imputation of Wickedncis 
and Folly. 

But if Marriage be fuch a blefled 
State, how comes it, may you lay, that 
there arc lb few happy Marriages ? Now 
in anfwer to this, it is not to be won- 
der'd that fo few fucceed ; we fhould ra- 
ther be furpriz'd to find fo many do, con- 
fidering how imprudently Men engage^ 
the Motives they ad by, and the very 
Itrange Conduct ^hey obferve through^ 
out. 

For pray, what do Men propofe to 
themfelves in Marriage ? What Qualifi- 
cations do they look after in a Spoufe ? 
What will Ihc bring ? is the fir ft Enquiry : 
C 4 How 



14 



R E FLECTIONS 

How many Acres ? Or how much ready- 
Coin ? Not that this is altogether an un- 
nccefTary Queftion, for Marriage with- 
out a Competency, that is, not only a 
bare Subfiftence, but even a handfome 
and plentiful provifion, according to the 
Qiiality and Circumftances of the Parties, 
is no very comfortable Condition. They 
who marry for Love, as they call it, 
find Time enough to repent their rafh 
Folly, and are not long in being con- 
vinced, that whatever fine Speeches 
might be made in the Heat of Paflion, 
there could be no real Kindmfs between 
thofe who can agree to make each other 
miferable. But tho' an Eftate is to be 
confider'd, it Ihould not be the Maw, 
much lefs the only Confideration ; for 
H^ppinefs does not depend on Wealth ; 
That may be wanting, and too often is, 
where This abounds. He who marries 
himfelf to a Fortune only, muftexpedno 
pther Satisfaction than that can bring him ; 
\)\\t let him not fay that Marriage, but 
that his own covetous or prodigal Tem- 
p^r, has made him unhappy. What Joy 

has 



upon Marriage. 25 

has that Man in all his Plenty, who muft 
either run from home to poflefs it, con- 
trary to all the Rules of Juftice, to the 
Laws of God and Man, nay, even in 
Oppofition to good Nature and good 
Breeding too, which fome Men make 
more Account of than of all the reft ; or 
elfe be forc'd to fhare it with a Woman 
whofe Perfon or Temper is difagrccablc, 
whofe Prefence is fufficient to four all his 
Enjoyments, fo that if he has any Re- 
mains of Religion or good Manners, he 
muft fuffer the Uneafinefs of a continual 
Watch, to force himfclf to a conftrain'd 
Civility ? 

Few Men have fo much Goodnefs as 
to bring themfelves to a Liking of what 
they loath'd, meerly becaufe it is their 
Duty to like; on the contrary, when 
they marry with an Indiffercncy, to 
pleafe their Friends or increafe their For- 
tune, the Indiffercncy proceeds to an 
Averfion, and perhaps even the Kind- 
nefs and Complaifanceof the poorabus'd 
Wife, ihall only ferve to increafe it. 

What 



%6 Reflections 

What follows then ? There is no Con-* 
tent at home, fo it is fought elfewhere, 
and the Fortune fo unjuftly got, is as 
carelefly fquander'd ; the Man takes a 
Loofe, what fliould hinder him ? He has 
all in his Hands, and Cuftom has almoft 
taken off that fmall Reftraint Reputation 
us'd to lay. The Wife finds too late 
what was the Idol the Man adored, 
which her Vanity, perhaps, or it may 
be the Commands and Importunities of 
Relations, would not let her fee before ; 
and now he has got That into his Poffef- 
fion, Ihe mull make Court to him for a 
little forry Alimony out of her owa 
Eftate. If Difcretion and Piety pre- 
vail upon her Paffions, fhe fits down 
quietly contented with her Lot, feeks no 
Conlblation in the Multitude of Adorers, 
fince he whom only flie defir'd to pleafe, 
becaufe it was her Duty to do fo, will 
take no Delight in her Wit or Beauty ; 
She follows no Diverfion to allay her 
Grief, ufes no Cordials to fupport her 
Spirit, that may fully her Vertue or bring 
a Cloud uppn her Reputation ; fhe makes, 

na 



upon Marriage. 17 

no Appeals to the mif-judging Croud, 
hardly mentions her Misfortunes to her 
moft intimate Acquaintance, nor lays a 
Load on her Husband to eafc her fclf ; 
but would, if it were poHiblc, conceal 
his Crimes, though her Prudence and 
Vertue give him a thoufand Reproaches 
without her Intention or Knowledge* 
and retiring from the World, Ihc feeks a 
more Iblid Comfort than it can give her, 
taking Care to do nothing that Cenfbri- 
oufnefs, or even Malice it felf can mil^ 
conftrue to her Prejudice. Now ihc 
puts on all her Referves, and thinks even 
innocent Liberties fcarce allowable in 
her difconfolate State ; fhe has other Bur 
fmefs to mind : Nor docs Ihe in her Re- 
tirements reflect fb much upon the Hand 
that adminifters this bitter Cup, as coa- 
fider what is the beft Ufe fhe can make 
of it. And thus indeed, Marriage, 
however unfortunate in other refpcds, 
becomes a very great Blelling to her. 
She. might have been expofed to all the 
Temptations of a plentiful Fortune, 
have given up her felf to Sloth and 

Luxury, 



28 Reflections 

Luxury, and gone on at the commoH 
rate, even of the better Sort, in doing 
no Hurt, and as little Good : But now 
her kind Husband obliges her to Conji- 
deKy and gives Opportunity to exercile 
her Vertue • he makes it neceflary to 
withdraw from thofe Gaieties and Plea- 
fures of Life, which do more Mifchief 
under the Shew of Innocency, than they 
could if they appeared attended with a 
Crime, difcompoling and diflblving the 
Mind, and making it uncapable of any 
manner of Good, to be fure of any thing 
Great and Excellent. Silence and Soli- 
tude, the being forc'd from the ordinary 
Entertainments of her Station, may per- 
haps feem a defolate Condition at firft, 
and we may allow her, poor weak Wo- 
man ! to be fomewhat fhock'd at it, fince 
even a wife and courageous Man perhaps 
would not keep his Ground. We would 
conceal (if we could) for the Honour of 
the Sex, Mens being baffled and dispi- 
rited by a fmaller matter, were not the 
Inftances too frequent and too notorious. 

BVT 



upon Marriage^ 29 

But a little Time wears off all the 
Uneafinefs, and puts her in pofleflion of 
Pleafures, which till now ftie has unkind- 
ly been kept a Stranger to. Affli<^ion, 
the fincereft Friend, the frankeft Moni- 
tor, the beft Inftrudor, and indeed, the 
only ufeful School that" Women are ever 
put to, rouzes her Undcrftanding, opens 
her Eyes, fixes her Attention, and dif- 
fufes fuch a Light, fuch a Joy into her 
Mind, as not only Informs her better, 
but Entertains her more than ever her 
Ruel did, though crouded by the Men 
of Wit. She now diftinguilhes between 
Truth and Appearances, between folid 
and apparent Good j has found out the 
Inftability of all earthly Things, and 
w^on't any more be deceived by relying 
on them ; can difcern who are the Flat- 
terers of her Fortune, and who the Ad- 
mirers and Encouragers of her Vertue ; 
accounting it no little Blelling to be rid 
of thofe Leeches, who hung upon her 
only for their own Advantage. Now 
fober Thoughts fucceed to Hurry and 

Impcr- 



REFLECtiONS 
Impertinence, to Forms and Ceremony; 
ihe can fecure her Time, and knows how 
to improve it^ never truly a happy Wc- 
man till fhe came, in the Eye of the 
World, to be reckon'd Miferable. 

Thus the Husband's Vices maybe- 
come an Occaiion of the Wife's Vertues^ 
and his Negled do her a more real Good 
than his Kindnefs could. But all injured 
Wives don't behave themfelves after this 
Fafliion, nor can their Husbands juftly 
exped it. With what Face can *hc 
blame her for following his Example,- 
and being as extravagant on the one 
Hand, as he is on the other ? Though 
Ihe cannot juftify her Excelfes to God,- 
to the World, nor to her Self, yet fure- 
ly in refpcd of him they may admit of 
an Excufe. For to all the reft of his 
Abfurdities, (for Vice is always unrea- 
fonable) he adds one more, who expeds 
that Vertue from another which he won'6 
pradife himfelf 

Bt/f 



upon Marriage. 21 

But fuppofe a Man does not marry 
for Money, though for one that does 
not, perhaps there are thoufands that 
do ; fuppofe he marries for Love, an 
Heroick Action, which makes a mighty 
Noife in the World, partly becaufe of 
its Rarity, and partly in regard of its Ex- 
travagancy, what does his marrying for 
hove amount to ? There's no great Odds 
between his marrying for the Love of 
Money, or for the Love of Beauty ; the 
Man does not ad according to Reafon 
in either Cafe, but is governed by irre- 
gular Appetites. But he loves her Wit 
perhaps, and this, you'll fay, is more Spi- 
ritual, more Rcfin'd : Not at all, if you 
examine it to the Bottom. For what is 
that which now a-days paflcs under the 
Name of Wit ? A bitter and ill-natur'd 
Raillery, a pert Repartee, or a confi- 
dent talking at all • and in fuch a multi- 
tude of Words, it's Odds if fomething or 
other does not pafs that is furprizing, 
though every Thing that furprizes does 
not pleafe j ibme Things being wonder'd 

at 



5^ Reflections 

at for their Uglinefs, as well as others 
for their Beauty. True Wit, durft one 
venture to defcribc it, is quite another 
Thing ; it confifts in fuch a Sprightlinefs 
of Imagination, fuch a Reach and Turn 
of Thought, fo properly exprefs'd, as 
flrikcs and pleafes a judicious Tafte. 
For though, as one fays of Beauty, V/i 
in no FacCy but in the Lover^s Mind^ fb 
it may be faid of fome forts of Wit, it is 
not in him that fpeaks, but in the Ima- 
gination of his Hearer ; yet doubtlefs 
there is a true Standard-Wit, which 
muft be allowed for fuch by every one 
who underftands the Terms. I don't 
fay that they lliall all equally like it ; and 
it is this Standard-wit that always pleafes, 
the Spurious does fo only for a Seafbn. 

Now what is it that ftrikes a judici- 
ous Tafte ? Not that, to be fure, which 
injures the Abfent, or provokes the 
Company, which poilbns the Mind un- 
der Pretence of entertaining it, proceed- 
ing from, or giving Countenance to falfe 
Notions, to dangerous and immoral Prin* 

ciplcs.. 



upon Marriage. 3} 

ciplcs. Wit indeed is diftinft from 
Judgment, but it is not contrary to it ; 
'tis rather its Handmaid, ferving to awa- 
ken and fix the Attention, that fo we 
may judge rightly. Whatever charms, 
does fo becaufe of its Regularity and 
Proportion ^ otherwife, though it is Ex- 
traordinary and out of *the Way, it will 
only be ftar'd on like a Monfler, but 
can never be lik'd. And tho' a Thought 
is ever {o fine and new, ever fo well 
exprefs'd, if it fuits not with Decorum 
and good Manners, it is not juft and fit, 
and therefore offends our Reafon, and 
confequently has no real Charms, nor 
would afford us any Entertainment, if 
our Taftc were not deprav'd. 

But it muft not be fuppos'd that Wo- 
mens Wit approaches thofe Heights 
which Men arrive at, or that they in- 
dulge thofe Liberties the other take. 
Decency lays greater Reitraiats on them, 
their Timoroufnefs does them this one, 
and perhaps this only Piece of Service, 
it keeps them from breaking through 
D thefe 



34 Reflections 

thefe Reftraints, and following their 
Mafters and Guides in many of their 
daring and mafculinc Crimes. As the 
World goes, your Witty Men are ufual- 
ly diftinguifhM by the Liberty they take 
with Religion, good A'anners, or their 
Keighbours Reputation : But, G o d be 
thank'd, it is not yet fo bad, as that 
Women ihould form Cabals to propa- 
gate Atheifm and Irreligion *. A Man 
then cannot hope to find a Woman 
whofe Wit is of a Size with his, but 
when he doats on Wit, it is to be ima- 
gin'd he makes Choice of that which 
comes the neareft to his own. 

Thus, whether it be Wit or Beauty 
that a Man's in Love with, there are no 
great Hopes of a ] ailing Happinefs- 
Beauty, with all the Helps of Art, is of 
no long Date j the more it is help'd, the 
iboner it decays ; and he, who only or 
chiefly chofe for Beauty, will in a little 
Time find the fame Reafon for £|nother 
Choice. Nor is that fort of Wit which 

* This yvas rcrotc in tin Beginning of the ^refent Century. 

he 



upon Marriage. 35 

he prefers, of a more iure Tenure ; or 
allowing it to laft, it will not always 
pleafe. For that which has not a real 
Excellency and Value in it felf, enter- 
tains no longer than that giddy Humour 
which recommended it to us holds j and 
when we can like on no juft, or on very 
little Ground, *tis certain a Diilike will 
arife, as lightly and as unaccountably. 
And it is not improbable that fuch a 
Husband may in a little Time, by ill 
Ufage, provoke fuch a Wife to exercifc 
her Wit, that is, her Spleen on him, 
and then it is not hard to guefs how 
very agreeable it will be to him. 

I N a word, when we have reckoned 
up how many look no further than the 
making of their Fortune, as they call it • 
who don't fb much as propofe to them- 
felves any Satisfadion in the Woman to 
whom they plight their Faith, feeking 
only to be Mailers of her Eftatc, that 
fo they may have Money enough to in- 
dulge all their irregular Appetites ; who 
think they are as good as can be cx- 
D 2 peeled^ 



j6 Reflections 

pected, if they are but, according to the 
falhionable Term, Civil Husbands ; when 
we have taken the Number of your gid- 
dy Lovers, who are not more violent in 
their Paflion than they are certain to 
repent of it ; when to thefe you have 
added fuch as marry without any 
Thought at all, further than that it is 
the Cuftom of the World, what others 
have done before them, that the Family 
mull be kept up, the antient Race pre- 
fer v'd, and therefore their kind Parents 
and Guardians choofe as they think con- 
venient, without ever confulting the 
Young one's Inclinations, who muft be 
fatisiied, or pretend fo at leaft, upon 
I*ainof their Difpleafure, and that heavy 
Confequence of it. Forfeiture of their 
Eftate : Thefe fet afide, I fear there will 
be but a fmall Remainder to marry out 
of better Confiderations ; and even 
amongft the Few that do, not one in a 
Hundred takes Care to deferve his Choice. 

But do the Women never choofe 
amifs ? Are the Men only in Fault ? 

That 



up07j Marriage. ^7 

That is not "pretended ; for he who w ill 
bejuftj muft be forc'd to acknowledge, 
that neither Sex are always in the right. 
A Woman, indeed, can't properly be 
faid to Choofe ; all that is allowed her, 
is to Refufe or Accept wh;U is ofFer'd. 
And when we have made fiich rcalbn- 
able Allowances as arc due to the Sex, 
perhaps they may not appear lb much 
in Fault as one would at firft imagine, 
and a generous Spirit will find more Oc- 
cafion to Pity, than to Reprove. But 

lure I tranrgrcfs it muft not be Ihp- 

posM that the Ladies can do aniifs ! He 
is but an ill-bred Fellow who pretends 
that they need Amendment I They arc, 
no doubt on't, always in the right, and 
moft of all when they take Pity on di- 
ftrcffed Lovers ! Whatever ihQyfey car- 
ries an Authority that no Reafon can 
refift, and all that they do mud needs be 
Exemplary ! This is the Modifh Lan- 
guage, nor is there a Man of Honour 
amongft the whole Tribe, that would 
not venture his Life, nay, and his Sal- 
vation too, \n their Defence, if any but 
I) 3 himfelf 



3? Reflections 

himfelf attempts to injure them. But I 
muft ask Pardon if I can't come up to 
thefe Heights, nor flatter them with the 
having no Faults, which is only a ma- 
licious Way of continuing and increa- 
fing their Miftakes. 

Women, it's true, ought to be treat- 
ed with Civility ; for fince a little Cere- 
mony and out-fide Refped is all their 
Guard, all the Privilege that's • allow'd 
them, it were barbarous to deprive them 
of it ; and becaufe I would treat them 
civilly, I would not orprcfs my Civility 
at the ufual rate. I would not, under 
Pretence of Honouring and paying a 
mighty Deference to the Ladies, call 
them Fools, or what's worfe, to their 
Faces ; For what are all the fine Speeches 
and Submiflions that are made, but an 
abufing them in a well-bred Way ? She 
raufl: be a Fool with a Witnefs, who can 
believe a Man, Proud and Vain as he is, 
will lay his boafted Authority, the Dig- 
nity and Prerogative of his Sex, one 
Moment at her Fcety but in Prolpcd of 

taking 



upon Marriage. 39 

taking it up again to more Advantage ; 
he may call himfelf her Slave a fevv 
Days, but it is only in order to make' 
her his all the reft ol" his Life. 

Indeed that miftaken Self-Love that 
reigns in the moft of us, both Men and 
Women, that over-good Opinion we have 
of ourfelves, and Dcfire that others ihould 
have of us, makes us fwallow every 
Thing that looks like Refpcd, without 
examining how wide it is from what it 
appears to be. For nothing is in Truth 
a greater Outrage than Flattery and 
fcign'd Submiilions ; the phin E>/g ///?:? of 
which is this, " I have a very mean 
" Opinion both of your Undcrftanding 
^' and Vcrtue • you are Weak enough to 
" be impos'd on, and Vain enough to 
" fnatch at the Bait I throw ; there's no 
" Danger of your finding out myMean- 
" ing, or difappointing me of my Ends. 
" I offer you Incenfe^ 'tis true, but you 
*' are like to pay for't, and to make me 
" a Rccompcnce for your Folly, in inia- 
" gining I would give my felf this Trou- 
D 4 " ble, 



40 Refbections 

" ble, did I not hope, nay, were I not 
" fure, to find my own Account in it. 
" If for nothing elfe, you'll ferve at 
" leaft as an Exercife of my Wit ; and 
'- how much foever you fwell with 
" my Breath, *tis I dcferve the Praife for 
" talking fo well on fo poor a Subject, 
" We, who make the Idols, are the 
" greater Deities ; and as we fet you up, 
" fo it is in our Power to reduce you to 
" your firft Obfcurity, or to fomewhat 
" worfc, to Contempt ; you arc there- 
'' fore only on your good Behaviour, 
" and are like to be no more than what 
*'"' we pleafe to make you. '* This is 
the Flatterer's Language afide, this is 
the true Senfe of his Heart, whatever his 
Grimace may be before the Company. 

A N D if this be the true Meaning of 
honourable Courtlhip, what is meant by 
that Jargon, that Profufion of JLove and 
Admiration which palTcs fof Gallantry, 
when either of the parties are married ? 
Is it not the utmoft Scurrihty, in that 
it fuppofes fhe is, or that he hopes to 

make 



upon Marriage. 41 

make her, what good Manners forbids to 
name ? And fince he makes fo free with 
the Lady's Honour, can Ihe afford him 
a civiller Anfwer, than what her Foot- 
man may dehver with a Crab-tree? But 

I corred my felf, this might be the 

Air of a haughty Roman Prude ; our 
BrlttJJj Beauties are far more Gentle and 
Well-bred. And he who has the fame 
Defigns upon other Mens Relations, is 
fometimes fo civil as to bear with the 
Outrages offcr'd to his own. 



*t>^ 



Not but that 'tis pofTible, and fome- 
times Matter of Fad, to exprefs our 
felves beyond the Truth in Praife of a 
Perfon, and yet not be guilty of Flat- 
tery; but then we muft Think what 
we Say, and Mean what we Profefs. 
We may be fo blinded by fonie Paflion 
or other, efpecially Love, which in Ci- 
vil and Good-natur'd Perfons is apt to 
exceed, as to believe fome Perfons more 
defcrving than really they are, and to 
pay them greater Rcfpcct and Kindnefs 
than is in Striclnefs due to them. But 
this is not the prefent Cafe ; for our line 

Speech- 



Reflections 
Speech-makers doat too much on them- 
felves to have any great Paflion for 
another. Their Eyes are commonly too 
much fix'd on their own Excellencies, to 
view another's good Qualities through a 
Magnifying-Glafs ; at lea ft if ever they 
turn that End of tbe Perfpedive towards 
their Neighbours, 'tis only in Refped 
and Reference to themfelves. They are 
their own Centres, they find a Difpro- 
portion in every Line that does not tend 
thither, and in the next Vifit they make, 
you fhall hear all the fine Things they 
had faid, repeated to the new Object, 
and nothing remembred of the former 
but her Vanity, orlbmething elfe as ri- 
diculous, which lerves for a Foil, or a 
Whet to Difcourfe. For let there be 
ever fo many Wits in the Company, 
Converfation would languiih, and they 
would be at a Lofs, did not a little Cen- 
forioufnefs come in at a Need to help 
them. 

Let us then treat the Ladies as ci- 
villy as may be, but let us not do it by 

Flatter- 



iip07i Marriage. 4^ 

Flattering them, but by endeavouring 
to make them fuch as may truly delerve 
our hearty Efteem and Kindnels. Men 
ought really for their own Sakes, to do 
what in them lies to make Women Wile 
and Good, and then it might be hoped 
they themfelves woirid efFcclually Study 
and Pradice that Wifdom and Vertue . 
they recommend to others. But fb long 
as Men, even the bcft of them, who do 
not outrage the Women they pretend to 
adore, have bafe and unworthy Ends to 
ferve, it is not to be expeded that they 
fhould confent to fuch Methods as would 
certainly difippoint them. They would 
have their own Relations do well • it is 
their Intereft : but it fometimes happens 
to be for their Turn that another Man's 
fliould not, and then their Generofity 
fails them, and no Man is apter to find 
Fault with another's difhonourable Ani- 
ons, than he who is ready to do, or per- 
haps has done the fime\himfelf. 

And as Men have little Reafon to ex- 
pect Happiiicfs when they marry only 

for 



44 Reflections 

for the Love of Money, Wit, or Beauty, 
as has been aheady ftiewn, fo much lefs 
can a Woman expect a tolerable Life, 
when fhe goes upon thefe Confiderati- 
ons. Let the Bufinefs be carried as 
prudently as it can be on the Woman's 
Side, a reafonable Man can't deny that 
ftie has by much the harder Bargain : J 
becaibfe fhe puts her felf intirely into her 
Husband's Power, and if the Matrimo- 
nial Yoke be grievous, neither Law nor 
Cuftom afford her that Redrefs which a 
Man obtains. He who has Sovereign 
Power does not value the Provocations of 
a Rebellious Subjed ; he knows how to 
fubdue him with Eafe, and will make 
himfelf obeyed : But Patience and Sub- 
miffion are the only Comforts that are 
left to a poor People, who groan under 
Tyranny, unlefs they are Strong enough 
to break the Yoke, to Depofe and Ab- 
dicate, which, 1 doubt, would not be 
allow'd of here. For whatever may be 
filid againfl PafTivc-Obedience in another 
Cafe, I fuppofe there's no Man but likes 
k very well in this j how much foever 

Arbi- 



upon Marriage. 45- 

Arbitrary Power may be diflik'd on a 
Throne, not Miitou, nor £, H — , nor 
any of the Advocates of Refiftance, 
would cry up Liberty to poor Female 
Slaves^ or plead for the Lawfulnefs of 
Refining a private Tyranny. 

I F there be a Difagreeablcnefs of Hu- 
mours, this, in my Mind, is harder to 
be born than greater Faults, as being a 
continual Plague, and for the moft Part 
incurable. Other Vices a Man may grow 
weary of, or may be convinced of the 
Evil of them, he may forfake them, or 
they him, but his Humour and Temper 
are feldom, if ever, put off. Ill-nature 
flicks to him from his Youth to his grey 
Hairs, and a Boy that's Humorous and 
Proud, makes a Peevifh, Pofitive, and 
Infolent Old Man. Now if this be the 
Cafe, and the Husband be full of Him- 
felf, obftinately bent on his own Way, 
with or without Realbn, if he be one 
who mull be always Admired, always 
Humour'd, and yet fcarce knows what 
will pleafe him ; if he has Profperity 

enough 



4<^ Reflections 

enough to keep him from confidering, 
and to farniHi him with a Train of Flat- 
^ terers and obfequious Admirers; and 
Learning and Senfe enough to make him 
a Fop in Perfedion ; for a Man can 
never be a compleat Coxcomb, unlefs 
he has a confiderable Share of thefe to 
value himfelf upon •' What can the poor 
Woman do ? The Husband is too Wife 
to be Advis'd, too Good to be Reformed, 
Jhe muft follow all his Paces, and tread 
in all his unreafbnable Steps, or there is 
no Peace, no Qiiiet for her j fhe muft 
Obey with the greatcft Exaclnefs, 'tis in 
vain to expect any manner of Compli- 
ance on his Side, and the more Ihe com- 
plies the more fhe may ; his fantaftical 
Humours grow with her Defire to gratify 
them^ for Age increafes Opinionatry in 
fome, as well as it does Experience ii> 
others. Of fuch foit of Folks as thefe 
it was that So/omcii/ fpake, when he faid, 
Seejl thou a Man wife jn his own Conceit^ 
there is more hope of a Fool than of him \ 
That is, the profligate Sinner, fuch a 
one being always a Fool in Solomon's 

Lan- 



upon Marriage. ^7 

Language, is in a fairer Way of being 
convinc'd of his Folly, and brought to 
Reafon, than the Proud, Conceited Man. . 
That Man, indeed, can never be good 
at Heart, who is full of Himfelf and his 
own Endowments : Not that it is necef^ 
fary, becaufe it is not poffible (human- 
ly fpeaking) for one to be totally igno- 
rant of his own good Qualities, I had 
almoft faid, he ought to have a modeft 
Senfe of *em, othcrwife he can't be duly 
thankful, nor make the Ufe of them that 
is required, to the Glory of God, and 
the Good of Mankind ; but he views 
them in a wrong Light, if he difcerns 
any Thing that may exalt him above his 
Neighbours, make him over-look their 
Merit, or treat them with Negled or 
Contempt. He ought to behold them 
with Fear and Trembling, as Talents 
which he has freely receiv'd, and for 
which he is highly Accountable, and 
therefore they fhould not excite his Pride, 
but his Care and Induftry. 

And 



Reflections 

And if Pride and Self-conceit keep a 
Man who has fome good Qualities, and 
is not fo bad as the moft of his Neigh- 
bours, frpm growing better, it for cer- 
tain confirms and hardens the Wicked 
in his Crimes, it fets him up for a Wit, 
that is, according to modern Accepta- 
tion, one who rallies all that is ferious, a 
Contemner of the Priefts firft, and then 
of the Deity Himfelf. For Penitence 
and Self-condemnation are what his 
Haughtinefs cannot bear, and lince his 
Crimes have brought upon him the Re- 
proaches of his own Mind, fince he will 
not take the regular Way to be rid of 
them, which is, by Humbling himfelf, 
and making his Peace with Heaven, he 
bids Defiance to it, and wou'd, if he 
could, believe there is no future State, no 
After-retribution, becaule he has too 
juft Reafon to fear it. 

If therefore it be a Woman's hard 
Fate to meet with a difagreeable Tem- 
per, and of all others, the Haughty, 

Impe- 



tipon Marriage. 45^ 

Imperious, and Self-conceited are the 
moft fo, ihe is as unhappy as any Thing 
in this World can make her. For when 
a Wife's Temper does not pleafe, if fhe 
makes her Husband uneafy, he can find 
Entertainments Abroad ; he has a hun- 
dred Ways of relieving himfelf; but 
neither Prudence nor Duty will allow a 
Woman to fly out : her BufincTs and En- 
tertainment are at home ; and tho' he 
makes it ever i^o uneafy to her, fhe muft 
be content, and make her beft on't. She 
who eleds a Monarch for Life, who 
gives him an Authority, fhe cannot re- 
call, however he mifapply it, who puts 
her Fortune and Perfbn entirely in his 
Power, nay, even the very Defires of her 
Heart, according to fomc learned Ca- 
fuifts, lb as that it is not lawful to Will 
or Defire any Thing but what he ap- 
proves and allows, had need be very fure 
that fhe does not make a Fool her Head, 
nor a Vicious Man her Guide and Pat- 
tern ; file had beft ftay till Ihe can meet 
with one who has the Government of his 
own Palfions, and has duly regulated his 

E own 



5^ 



Reflections 

own Defires, fince he is to have luch 
an abfolute Power over hers. But 
he who doats on a Face, he who makes 
Money his Idol, he who is charm'd with 
vain and empty Wit, gives no fuch Evi- 
dence, either of Wifdom or Goodnefs, 
that a Woman of any tolerable Senfe 
lhou*d care to venture her felf to his 
Condud. 

Indeed, your fine Gentleman's Ani- 
ons are now a-days fuch, that did not 
Cuftom and the Dignity of his Sex give 
Weight and Authority to them, a Wo- 
man that thinks twice might blefs her 
felf, and fay. Is this the Lord and Ma- 
iler to whom I am to promife Love, 
Honour and Obedience ? W^hat can be 
the Objed of Love but amiable Quali- 
ties, the Image of the Deity imprefs'd 
upon a generous and godUke Mind, a 
Mind that is above this World, to be 
fure above all the Vices, the Tricks and 
Bafenefs of it ; a Mind that is not full 
of it felf, nor contraded to little private 
Interefts, but which, in Imitation of 

that 



upon Marriage. . j I 

that glorious Pattern it endeavours to 
copy after, expands and difFufes it felf 
to its utmoft Capacity in doing Good. 
But this fine Gentleman is quite of ano- 
ther Strain, he is the Reverfe of this in 
every Inftance. He is, I confcfs, very 
fond of his own Dear Perfon, he fees 
very much in it to admire j his Air and 
Mien, his Words and Actions, every 
Motion he makes, declare it • but they 
muft have a Judgment of his Size, every 
whit as fhallow, and a Partiality as great 
as his own, who can be of his Mind. 
How then can I Love ? And if not Love, 
much lefs Honour. Love may arife 
from Pity, or a generous Defire to make 
that Lovely which as yet is not fo, when 
we fee any hopes of Succefs in our En- 
deavours of improving it ; but Honour 
fuppofcs fome excellent Qiialiti<^s al- 
ready, fbmething worth ourEfteem; but, 
alas ! there is nothing more contempti- 
ble than this Trifle of a Man, this meer 
Out-fidc, whofe Mind is as bale and 
mean as his external Pomp is glittering. 
His Office or Title apart, to which fome 
E 1 cere- 



5^ Reflections 

ceremonious Obfervancc muft be paid 
for Order's fake, there's nothing in him 
that can command our Refped. Strip 
him of Equipage and Fortune, and fuch 
Things as only dazle our Eyes and Ima- 
ginations, but don't in any meafure af- 
fed our Reafon, or caufe a Reverence 
in our Hearts, and the poor Creature 
finks beneath our Notice, becaufe not 
fupported by real Worth. And if a 
Woman can neither Love nor Honour, 
fhe does ill in promifing to Obey, fince 
fhe is like to have a crooked Rule to re- 
gulate her Adions. 

A M E E R Obedience, fuch as is paid 
only to Authority, and not out of Love 
and a Senfe of the Juftice and Reafon- 
ablcnefs of the Command, will be of an 
uncertain Tenure. As it can't but be 
■uneafy to the Perfon who pays it, ib he 
who receives it will be fometimes difap- 
pointed when he expeds to find it : For 
that Woman muft be endow'd with a 
Wifdom and Goodnefs much above what 
we fuppofe the Sex capable of, I fear 

much 



jipon Marriage. 53 

much greater than any Man can pretend 
to, who can ^o conftantly conquer her 
Pallions, and divert her felf even of In- 
nocent Self-love, as to give up the 
Caufe when Ihe is in the Right, and to 
fubmit her inlightned Rcafon, to the 
imperious Dictates of *a blind Will, and 
wild Imagination, even when llie clearly 
perceives the ill Conlequences of it, the 
Imprudence, nay. Folly and Madnefs of 
fuch a Condud. 

And if a Woman runs fuch a Rifque 
when fhe marries prudently, according 
to the Opinion of the World, that is, 
when fhe permits her fclf to be difpos'd 
of to a Man equal to her in Birth, Edu- 
cation and Fortune, and as good as the 
moft of his Neighbours, (for if none 
were to marry, but Men of ftricl Vertue 
and Honour, I doubt the World would 
be but thinly Peopled) if at the verybeft 
her Lot is hard, what can fhe expect 
who is Sold, or any otherwife betray'd 
into mercenary Hands, to one who is in 
all, or moft refpects, unequal to her ? 
E 3 A 



54 Reflections 

A Lover who comes upon what is call*d 
equal Terms, makes no very advanta- 
geous Propofal to the Lady he courts, 
and to whom he feems to be an humble 
Servant. For under many founding 
CompHments, Words that have nothing 
in them, this is his true Meaning- He 
wants one to manage his Family, an 
Houfe-keeper, one whofe Intereft it will 
be not to wrong him, and in whom 
therefore he can put greater Confidence 
than in any he can hire for Money. One 
who may breed his Children, taking all 
the Care and Trouble of their Educa- 
tion, to preferve his Name and Family. 
One whofe Beauty, Wit, or good Hu- 
mour and agreeable Converfation, will 
entertain him at Home when he has been 
contradided and difappointed Abroad ; 
who will do him that Juflice the ill-na- 
tur'd World denies him ; that is, in any 
one's Language but his own, footh his 
Pride and flatter his Vanity, by having 
always fo much good Senfe as to be on 
his Side, to conclude him in the Right, 
when others arc fo ignorant, or fo rude 



3 

as 



I 



upon Marriage. 55 

as to deny it. Who will not be blind 
to his Merit nor contradict his Will and 
Plealure, but make it her Bufinefs, her 
very Ambition to content him ; whofe 
Softnels and gentle Compliance will calm 
his Pailions, to whom he may fafely dil^ 
clofe his troublefome Thoughts, and in 
her Breaft dilcharge his Cares • whole 
Duty, .Subniillion and Oblervance, will 
heal thofc Wounds other Peoples Oppo- 
fition or Negled have given him. In a 
word, one whom he can intirely Govern, 
and confequently may form her to his 
Will and Liking, who muft be his for 
Life, and therefore cannot quit his Ser- 
vice, let him treat her how he will. 

And if this be what every Man ex- 
pects, the Sum of his violent Love and 
Courtfliip, w hen it is put into Senfe, and 
rendred Intelligible, to what a line pals 
does flic bring her felf who purchafes a 
Lord and Mailer, not only with her 
Money, but with what is of greater 
Value, at the Price of her Difcretion! 
W ho has not fo much as that poor Ex- 
K 4 cufc, 



6 Reflections 

cufe, Precedent and Example ; or if flie 
has, they are only fuch as all the World 
condemns? She will not find him lefs a 
Governor becaufe ihe was once his Su- 
perior, on the contrary, the Scum of the 
People are moft Tyrannical when they 
get the Power, and treat their Betters 
with the greateft Infolence. For, as the 
wife Man long fince obferv'd, A Servant 
when he Reigns, is one of thofe Things 
for which the Earth is difquieted, and 
which no body is able to bear. 

I T is the hardcft Thing in the World 
for a Woman to know that a Man is not 
Mercenary, that he does not act on bafe 
and ungenerous Principles, even when he 
is her Equal, becaufe being abfolute Ma- 
iler, fhe and all the Grants he makes her 
are in his Power, and there have been 
but too many Inftances of Husbands, 
that by wheedling, or threatning their 
Wives, by feeming Kindncfs, or cruel 
Ufagc, have perfuaded, or forc'd them 
out of what has been fettled on them, 
So that the Woman has in Truth no Se- 
curity 



tipon M A R R I A. G E. 57 

curity but the Man's Honour and Good- 
nature, a Security that in this prefent 
Age no wife Perfon would venture much 
upon. A Man enters into Articles very 
readily before Marriage, and fo he may, 
for he performs no more of them after- 
wards than he thinks fit. A Wife muft 
never difpute with her Husband ; his 
Reafons are now, no doubt on't, better 
than hers, whatever they were before • 
he is fure to pcrfuade her out of her 
Agreement, and bring her, it muft be 
fuppos'd, frU/ingfyy to give up what 
Ihe did vainly hope to obtain, and what 
Ihe thought had been made fure to her. 
And if fhe fhews any Refradorinels, 
there are Ways enough to humble her ; 
fo that by Right or Wrong the Husband 
gains his Will. For Covenants between 
Husband and Wife, like Laws in an Ar- 
bitrary Government, are of little Force, 
the Will of the Sovereign is All in All. 
Thus it is in Matter of Fad, I will not 
anfwer for the Right of it j for if the 
Woman's Reafons, upon which thofe 
Agreements are grounded, are not juft 

and 



5 8 Reflections 

and good, why did he confent to them ? 
Was it becaufe there was no other Way 
to obtain his Suit, and with an Intention 
to annul them when it fhall be in his 
Power ? Where then is his Sincerity ? 
But if her Reafons are good, where is 
his Juftice in obliging her to quit them ? 
He neither way ads like an equitable or 
honell Man. 

But when a Woman marries unequal- 
ly and beneath her felf, there is almoft 
Demonftration that the Man is fordid 
and unfair • that inftead of loving her 
he only loves himfelf, trapans and ruins 
her to ferve his own Ends. For if he 
had not a mighty Opinion of himfelf, 
(which Temper is like to make an ad- 
mirable Husband) he would never ima- 
gine that his Perfon and good Qualities 
could make Compenfation for all the Ad- 
vantages fhe quits on his Account. If 
he had a real Efteem for her, or valued 
her Reputation, he would not expole it, 
nor have her Difcretion call'd in Que- 
ftion for his fake j and if he truly lov'd 

her, 



upon Marriage. 59 

her, he would not reduce her to Straits 
and a narrow Fortune, nor fo much as lef- 
fen her way of Living to better his own. 
For fince God has placed different Ranks 
m the World, put fome in a higher, 
and fome in a lower Station, for Order 
and Beauty's fake, and for many good 
Reafons ; though it is both our Wifdom 
and Duty not only to fubmit wicji Pa- 
tience, but to be thankful and well-fa- 
tisiied, when by his Providence we are 
brought low, yet there is no manner of 
Reafon for us to degrade our fclvcs j on 
the contrary, much why we ought not. 
The better our Lot is in this World, 
and the more we have of it, the greater 
is our Leifure to prepare for the next j 
we have the more Opportunity to exer- 
cife that God-like Qiiality, to tafte that 
Divine Pleafure, doing Good to the Bo- 
dies and Souls of thole beneath us. Is it 
not then ill Manners to Heaven, and an 
irreligious Contempt of its Favours, for 
a Woman to flight that nobler Employ- 
ment, to which it has ailign'd her, and 
thruft her fclf down to a meaner Drud- 



Co Reflections 

gery, to what is in the 'very literal Senfe 
a caring for the Things of the World, a 
caring not only to Plcafe, but to Main- 
tain a Husband ? 

And a Husband fo chofen will not at 
all abate of his Authority and Right to 
Govern, whatever fair Promifes he might 
make before. She has made him her 
Head, and he thinks himfelf as well 
qualified as the Beft to ad accordingly, 
nor has fhe given him any fuch Evidence 
of her Prudence as may difpofe him to 
make an Ad of Grace in her Favour. 
Beiides, great Obligations are what Su- 
periors cannot bear, they are more than 
can be returned; to acknowledge were 
only to reproach themfelves with Ingra- 
titude, and therefore the readicft Way 
is, not to own, but overlook them, or 
rather, as too many do, to repay them 
with Atfronts and Injuries. 

What. then is to be done ? How mull 
a Man choofe, and what Qualities muft 
incline a Woman to accept, that fo our 

married 



upon Marriage. ^i 

married Couple may be as happy as that 
State can make them ? This is no hard 
Queftion; let the Soul be principally 
confider'd, and Regard had in the firft 
place to a good Underftanding, a ver- 
tuous Mind; and in all other refpcds 
let there be as much Equality as may 
be. If they are good Chriftians and of 
fuitable Tempers all will be well; but I 
fhould be ihrewdly tempted to fulped 
their Chriftianity who marry after any 
of thofe Ways we have been fpeaking 
of. I dare venture to fay, that they 
don't ad according to the Precepts of 
the Gofpel, they neither Ihew the Wif- 
dom of the Serpent, nor the Innocency 
of the Dove; they have neither fo much 
Government of themfelves, nor fo much i 
Charity for their Neighbours ; they 
neither take fuch Care not to fcandalize 
others, nor to avoid Temptations them- 
felves, are neither fo much above this 
World, nor fo alfcclcd \«ith the next, 
as they would certainly be, did theChri- 
ftian Religion operate in their Hearts, 
did they rightly underftand, andfincerely 

pradife 



6i Reflections 

praflife it, or adcd i^ideed according to 
the Spirit of the Gofpel. 

But it is not enough to enter wifely 
into this State, Care muft be taken of 
our Conduct afterwards. A Woman 
will not want being admonilh'd of her 
Duty ; the Cuftom of the World, Oeco- 
nomy, every Thing almoft reminds her 
of it. Governors do not often fuffer 
their Subjects to forget Obedience through 
their want of demanding it ; perhaps 
Husbands are but too forward on this 
Occafion, and claim their Right oftner 
and more imperioufly than either Dis- 
cretion or good Manners will juftify, 
and might have both a more chearful 
and conftant Obedience paid them if 
they were not fo rigorous in exading it. 
For there is a mutual Stipulation, and 
Love, Honour, and Worlhip, by which 
certainly Civility and Refped at leaft 
are meant, are as much the Woman's 
Due, as Love, Honour and Obedience 
are the Man's. And being the Woman 
is faid to be the weaker Veflel, the Man 

ftiould 



' upon Marriage. (,-> 

fiiould be more careful not to grieve or 
offend her. Since her Rcafon is fuppos'd 
to be lels, and her Paffions ftronger than 
his, he fhould not give Occafion to call 
that Suppofition in Qiieftion by his pet- 
tifh Carriage and needlefs Provocations. 
Since he is the Maif^ by which very 
word Cuftom would have us underftand 
not only greateft Strength of Body, but 
even greateft Firmnefs and Force of 
Mind, he Ihould not play the little Ma^ 
fler fo much as to exped to be cocker'd, 
nor run over to that Side which the Wo- 
man us'd to be rank'd in ; for, accord- 
ing to the Wifdom of the Italians^ Will 
you? Is J poke n to Jtck Folks. 

Indeed Subjection, according to the 
common Notion of it, is not over eafy ; 
none of us, whether Men or Women, 
but have fo good an Opinion of our own 
Conduct, as to believe we are fit, if not 
to direct others, at leaft to govern our 
lelves. Nothing but a found Under- 
ftanding, and Grace, the beft Improver 
of Natural Reafon, can corred this Opi- 
nion, 



(5^ Reflections 

nion, truly humble us, and heartily re- 
concile us to Obedience. This bitter 
Cup therefore ought to be fweetned as 
much as may be ; for Authority may be 
preferv'd and Government kept invio- 
lable, without that naufeous Oftentation 
of Power, which ferves to no End or 
Purpofe, but to blow up the Pride and 
Vanity of thofe who have it, and to ex- 
afperate the Spirits of fuch as muft truc- 
kle under it. 

Insolence is never the EfFed of 
Power but in weak and cowardly Spi- 
rits, who wanting true Merit and Judg- 
ment to fupport themfelves in that Ad- 
vantageous Ground on which they ftand, 
are ever appealing to their Authority, 
and making; a Shew of it to maintain 
their Vanity and Pride. A truly great 
Mind, and fuch as is fit to Govern, tho' 
it may ftand on its Right with its Equals, 
and modeftly exped what is due to it 
even from its Superiors, yet it never con- 
tends with its Inferiors, nor makes uie 
of its Superiority but to do them Good. 

So 



upon Marriage. 6^ 

So that confidering the juft Dignity of 
Man, his great Wifdom {o confpicuous 
on all Occafions ! the Goodnefs of hi3 
Temper, and Realbnablenefs of all his 
Commands, which make it a Woman's 
Intereft as well as Duty to be obfervant 
and obedient in all Things ; that his Pre- 
rogative is fettled by an undoubted Right 
and the Prefcription of many Ages ; it 
cannot be fuppos'd, that he fhould make 
frequent and inlblent Claims of an Au- 
thority fo well eftablifh'd and us'd with 
fuch Moderation, nor give an impartial 
By-ftander (could fuch an one be found) 
any Occafion from thence to fufped that 
he is inwardly confcious of the Badnels 
of his Title \ Ufurpers being always 
moft defirous of Recognitions, and bufy 
in impofing Oaths, whereas a Lawful 
Prince contents himfelf with the ufual 
Methods and Securities. 

And fince Power does naturally pufF 

up, and he who finds himfelf exalted, 

feldom fails to think he ought to be ib^ 

it is more fuitable to a Man's Wifdom 

F and 



66 Reflections 

and Generofity, to be mindful of his 
great Obligations, than to infift on his 
Rights and Prerogatives. Sweetnefs of 
Temper and an obliging Carriage are fo 
jiiftly due to a Wife, that a Husband 
who muft not be thought to want cither 
Underftanding to l^now what is fit, nor 
Goodnefs to perform it, can't be fup- 
pos'd not to fhew them. For fetting 
afide the Hazard of her Perfonto keep up 
his Name and Family, with all the Pains 
and Trouble that attend it, which may 
well be thought great enough to deferve 
all the Relped and Kindnefs that may 
be 5 fetting this afide, though 'tis very 
confiderable, a Woman has ib much the 
Difadvantage in moff^ I was about to 
fay, in all Things, that fhe makes a Man 
the greateft Compliment in the World 
when fhe condefcends to take him for 
Better for Worfe. She puts her felf in- 
tirely in his Power, leaves all that is dear 
to her, her Friends and Family, to 
efpoufe his Interefts and follow his For- 
tune, and makes it herBufinefsand Duty 
to pleafe him ! W^hat Acknowledgments, 

what 



upon Marriage. 67 

what Returns can he make ? What Gra- 
titude can be fufficient for fuch Obliga- 
tions? She ftiews her good Opinion of 
him by the great Truil: Ihc repoles in 
him, and what a Brute muft he be who 
betrays that Truft, or ads any way un- 
worthy of it ? Ingratitude is one of the 
bafeft Vices, and if a Man's Soul is funk 
fo low as to be guilty of it towards her 
who has {b gcneroufly oblig'd him, and 
who fo intirely depends on him, if he 
can treat her difrefpedfully, who has 
fo fully tellified her Efteem of him, Ihe 
muft have a Stock of \ ertue which he 
fhould blufh to difcern, if fhe can pay 
him that Obedience of which he is fo 
Unworthy. 

Superiors indeed are too apt to for- 
get the common Privileges of iMankind ; 
that their Inferiors Ihare with them the 
greateft Benefits, and are as capable as 
themfelves of enjoying the fupremeGood; 
that though the Order of the World re- 
quires an Outward Refped and Obedi- 
ence from fome to others, yet the iMind 
F 2 is 



68 Reflections 

is free, nothing but Reafon can oblige 
it, 'tis out of the Reach of the moft ab- 
folute Tyrant. Nor will it ever be well 
either with thofe who Rule or thofe in 
Subjedion, even from the Throne to 
every private Family, till thofe in Au- 
thority look on themfelves as plac'd in 
that Station for the Good and Improve- 
ment of their Subjeds, and not for their 
own Sakes ; not as the Reward of their 
Merit, or that they may profecute their 
own Defires and fulfil all their Pleafure, 
but as the Reprefentatives of God, whom 
they ought to imitate in the Juftice and 
Equity of their Laws, in doing Good 
and communicating Bleilings to all be- 
neath them : By which, and not by fol- 
lowing the imperious Didates of their 
own Will, they become truly Great and 
Illuftrious, and worthily fill their Place, 
And the Governed for their Part, ceafing 
to envy the Pomp and Name of Autho- 
rity, fhould refpecl their Governors as 
placed in G o d's ftead, and contribute 
what they can to eafe them of their real 
Cares, by a chearful and ready Com- 
pliance, 



upon Marriage. 69 

pliance, with their good Endeavours, 
and by affording them the Pleafure of 
Succefs in fuch noble and generous De- 
figns. 

For, upon a due Eftimate, Things arc 
pretty equally divided ; thofe in Sub- 
jedion, as they have a lefs Glorious, fb 
they have an eafier Task and a lefs Ac- 
count to give ; Whereas he who Com- 
mands, has in a great meafure the Faults 
of others to anfwer for as well as his own. 
'Tis true, he has the Pleafure of doing 
more Good than a private- Peribn can, 
and fhall receive the Reward of it when 
Time fhall be no more, in Compenfation 
for the Hazards he runs, the Difficulties 
he at prefent encounters, and the large 
Account he is to make hereafter. Which 
Pleafure and Reward are highly defira- 
ble, and mofl worthy our Purfuit • but 
they are Motives which fuch as Ufurp 
on their Governors, and make them un- 
eafy in the due Difcharge of their Duty, 
never propofe. As for thofe other little 
Things that move their Envy and Am- 
F 3 bition, 



^o Reflections 

bition, they are of no Efteeni with a juft 
Confiderer, nor will fuch as violently 
purfue, find their Account in them. 

But how can a Man refpe^t his Wife 
when he has a contemptible Opinion of 
her and her Sex ? When from his own 
Elevation he looks down on them as 
void of Underftanding, full of Igno- 
rance and Paflion, fo that Folly and a 
W^oman are equivalent Terms with him? 
Can he think there is any Gratitude due 
to her whofe utmoft Services he exacts 
as ftrid Duty ? Becaufe ftie was made to 
be a Slave to his Will, and has no 
higher End than to Serve and Obey 
him ? Perhaps we arrogate too much to 
our felves, when we fay this Material 
World was made for our Sakes : That 
its Glorious Maker has given us the Ufe 
of it is certain ^ but when we fuppofe 
any Thing to be made purely for our 
Sakes, becaufe we have Dominion over 
it, we draw a falfe Conclufion. As he 
who Ihould fay the People were made 
for the Prince who is fet over them, 

would 



Zip07t Marriage. 71 

would be thought to be out of his Sen- 
fes as well as his Politicks. Yet even 
allowing that God, who made every 
Thing in Number, Weight and Mea- 
fure, who never ads but for fome great 
and glorious End, an End agreeable to 
His Majefty ; allowing that He created 
fucha Number of Rational Spirits mere- 
ly to ferve their Fellow Creatures, yet 
how are thele Lords and Mafters help'd 
by the Contempt they fhew of their poor 
humble VafFals ? Is it not rather an Hin- 
drance to that Service they expect, as 
being an undeniable and conftant Proof 
how unworthy they are to receive it ? 

None of God*s Creatures, ablblutely 
confider'd, are in their own Nature con- 
temptible y the meaneft Fly, the pooreft 
Infecl has its Ufe and Yertue. Contempt 
is fcarce a Human Paflion, one may ven- 
ture to fay it was not in innocent Man, 
for till Sin came into the World, there 
was nothing in it to be contemned. But 
Pride, which makes every Thing fcrve 
its Purpofes, wrefted this Paffion from 
F 4 hs 



72 Reflections 

its only Ufc, fo that inftead of being aii 
Antidote againft Sin, it is become a 
grand Promoter of it, nothing making us 
more worthy of that Contempt we ftiew, 
than when, poor, weak, dependent Crea- 
tures as we are !' we look down with 
Scorn and Difdain on others. 

There is not afurerSign of a noble 
Mind, a Mind very far advanced to- 
wards Perfection, than the being able to 
bear Contempt and an unjuft Treatment 
from one's Superiors evenly and patient- 
ly. For inward Worth and real Excel- 
lency are the true Ground of Superiori- 
ty, and one Perfon is not in reality bet- 
ter than another, but as he is more Wife 
and Good. But this World being a 
Place of Trial, and governed by gene- 
ral Laws, juft Retributions being re- 
ferv'd for hereafter, Refped and Obe- 
dience many times become due for Or- 
der's fake, to thofe who don't otherwife 
deferve them. Now tho' Humility keeps 
us from over-valuing our felves or view- 
ing our Merit through a falfe and m^ag- 

nifyin« 



upon Marriage. 7j 

nifying Mediim^ yet it does not put out 
our Eyes, it does not, it ought not to 
deprive us of that plcafing Sentiment 
which attends our Ading as wc ought to 
Ad:, which is, as it were, a Forctafteof 
Heaven, our prelent Reward for doing 
what is juft and iit. ' And when a Su- 
perior does a mean and unjuft thing, as 
all Contempt of one's Neighbour is, and 
yet this does not provoke his Inferiors 
to refufc that Obfervance which their 
Stations in the World require, they 
cannot but have an inward Senfe of their 
own real Superiority, the other having 
no Pretence to it, at the fame Time that 
they pay him an outward Refped and 
Deference, which is fuch a flagrant Te- 
ftimony of the fincereft Love of Order, 
as proves their Souls to be of the highcft 
and nobleft Rank. 

A Man therefore for his own fake, 
and to give Evidence that he has a Right 
to thofe Prerogatives he affumes, Ihould 
treat Women with a little more Huma- 
nity and Regard than is ufually paid 

them. 



f4 Reflections 

them. Your whifling Wits may fcofFat 
them, and what then? It matters not, 
for they rally every Thing though ever 
fo facred, and rail at the Women com- 
monly in very good Company. Reli- 
gion, its Priefts, and thofe its moft con- 
ftant and regular Profeflbrs, are the ufual 
Subjects of their manly, mannerly and 
furprizing Jefts. Surprizing indeed ! 
not for the Newnefs of the Thought, the 
Brightnefs of the Fancy, or Noblenefs of 
Expreflion, but for the good Affurance 
with which fuch Thread-bare Jefts are 
again and again repeated. But that your 
grave Dons, your learned Men, and, 
which is more, your Men of Senfe, as 
they would be thought, Ihould ftoop fo 
low as to make Invectives againft the 
Women, forget themfelves fo much as 
to jeft with their Slaves, who have nei- 
ther Liberty, nor Ingenuity to make 
Reprizals ^ that they Ihould wafte their 
Time, and debafe their good Senle, 
which fits them for the moft weighty 
Affairs, fuch as are fuitable to their pro- 
found Wifdom and exalted Underftand- 

ingsl 



upon Marriage. f5 

Jng5 ! to render thofe poor Wretches, 
more ridiculous and odious who are al- 
ready in their Opinion fufficiently con-, 
temptible, and find no better Exercife 
of their Wit and Satire, than fuch as are 
not worth their Pains, though it were 
poiTible to Reform them, this, this in-, 
deed may juftiy be wondrcd at ! 

I Know not whether or no Women 
are allow'd to have Souls ; if they have, 
perhaps it is not prudent to provoke 
them too much, left, filly as they are, they 
at laft recriminate, and then what polite 
^nd well-bred Gentleman, though him- 
felf is conccrn'd, can forbear taking that 
lawful Pleafure, which all who under- 
ftand Raillery muft taftc, when they 
find his Jefts who infolently began to 
peck at his Neighbour, rcturn'd with 
Intereft upon his own Head ? And in- 
deed Men are too Humane, too Wife, 
to venture at i^, did they not hope for 
this EfFcd, and expect the Pleafure of 
finding their Wit turn to fuch Account : 
For if it be lawful to pry into a Secret, 

this 



yd Reflections 

this is, without doubt, the whole Dc- 
figa of thofe fine Difcourfes which have 
been made againft the Women from our 
great Fore-Fathers to this prefent Time \ 
Generous Man has too much Bravery, he 
is too Juil and too Good to affault a de- 
fencelefs Enemy, and if he d d inveigh 
againft the Women, it was only to do 
them Service ! For fince neither his Care 
of their Education, his hearty Endea- 
vours to improve their Minds, his whole- 
fome Precepts, nor great Example could 
do them good, as his laft and kindeft Ef- 
fay, he refolv'd to try what Contempt 
would do, and chofe rather to expofe 
himfelf by a feeming Want of Juftice, 
Equity, Ingenuity and Good-nature, 
than fufFer Women to remain fuch vain 
and infignificant Creatures as they have 
hitherto been reckoned ; and truly, Wo- 
men are fome Degrees beneath what I 
have thus far thought them, if they do 
not make the beft Ufe of his Kindnefs, 
improve themfelves, and, like Chriftians, 
return it. 

Let 



upon Marriage. 27 

Let us fee then what is their Part, 
what miift they do to make the Matri- 
monial Yoke tolerable to themfelves as 
well as pleafing to their Lords and Ma- 
ilers ? That the World is an empty and 
deceitfiil Thing, that 'thole Enjoyments 
which appear'd fo defirable at a Diftance, 
which rais'd our Hopes and Expectations 
to fiich a mighty Pitch, which we lb 
paffionately coveted, and fo eagerly pur- 
fued, vanifh at our lirft Approach, leav- 
ing nothing behind them but the Folly 
of Delufion, and the Pain of difappoint- 
ed Hopes, is a common Outcry ^ and 
yet, as common as it is, though we com- 
plain of being deceived this Inftant, we 
do not fail of contributing to the Cheat 
the very next. Though in reality it is 
not the World that abufes us, 'tis we 
abufe our felves; it is not the Emptinels 
of That, but our own falfe Judgments, 
our unreafonable Defires and Expeda- 
tions that torment us ; for he who ex- 
erts his whole Strength to lift a Straw, 
ought not to complain of the Burden, 

but 



^8 Reflections 

but of his own difproportionate Endea- 
vour which gives him the Pain he feels. 
The World affords us all the Pleafurc 
a found Judgment can cxpeft from it, 
and anfwers all thofe Ends and Purpofes 
for which it was defign'd ; let us exped 
no more than is reafonable, and then 
we Ihall not fail of our ExpedationSi 

I T is even fo in the Cafe befbi^e us • 
a Woman who has been taught to think 
Marriage her only Preferment, the Sum- 
Total of her Endeavours, the Comple- 
tion of all her Hopes, that which muft 
fettle and make her Happy in this 
World, and very few, in their Youth 
efpecially, carry a Thought fteadily to 
a greater Diftance s, She who has feen a 
Lover dying at her Feet, and can't 
therefore imagine that he who profelTes 
to receive all his Happinefs from her, 
can have any other Defign or Defire 
than to pleaie her ^ whofe Eyes have 
been dazled with all the Glitter and 
Pomp of a Wedding, and, who hears of 
nothing but Joy and Congratulation j 
t who 



tipon Marriage. 7p 

who is tranfported with the Pleafure of 
being out of Pupillage, and Miftrefs not 
only of her felf, but of a Family too : 
She who is either fo fimple or fo vain> 
as to take her Lover at his Word, either 
as to the Praifes he gave her, or the 
Promifes he made for himfelf ; in fum, 
fhe whofe Expe<i:\ation has been rais'd by 
Courtlhip, by all the fine Things that 
her Lover, her Governels and Domeftick 
Flatterers fay, will find a terrible Dis- 
appointment when the Hurry is over, 
and when Ihe comes calmly to confider 
her Condition, and views it no more 
under a falfc Appearance, but as it 
truly is. 

I Doubt in fuch a View it will not 
appear over- defirable, if file regards on- 
ly the prcfent State of Things. Here- 
after may make amends for what fhe 
muft be prepared to fufFer here, then 
will be her Reward, this is her Time of 
Trial, the Sealbn of exercifing and im- 
proving her Vertues. A Woman that 
is not Miltrefs of her Paflions, that can- 
not 



8o Reflections 

not patiently fubmit, even whenRealbn 
fuffers with her, who does not pradifc 
Paflive Obedience to the utmofl-, will 
never be acceptable to fuch an abfolute 
Sovereign as a Husband. Wifdom ought 
to Govern without Contradiction, but 
Strength however will be obeyed. There 
are but few of thofe wife Perfbns who 
can be content to be made yet wifer by 
Gontradidion • the moft will have their 
Will, and it is right becaufe it is theirs. 
Such is the Vanity of Human Nature, 
that nothing pleafes like an intire Sub- 
je<flion ; what Imperfedions won't a Man 
over-look where this is not wanting ! 
Though we live like Brutes, wc would 
have Incenfe ofFer'd us, that is only due 
to Heaven it felf, would have an abfo- 
lute and blind Obedience paid us by all 
over whom we pretend Authority. We 
were not made to Idolize one another, 
yet the whole Strain of Courtftiip is little 
jefs than rank Idolatry : But does a Man 
intend to give, and not to receive his 
Share in this Religious Worftiip? No 
fuch matter ^ Pride and Vanity, and 

Self- 



upon Marriage* 
Self-love have their Dcfigns, and if the 
Lover is fo condefcending as to fet a 
Pattern in the Time of hi j AddrefTcs, he 
is lb juft as to expert his Wife Ihould 
ftridly Copy after it all the reft of her 
JLifc. 

But how can a Woman fcriiple in- 
tire Subjcdion, how can fhe forbear to 
admire the Worth and Excellency of the 
Superior Sex, if fhe at all confidcrs it ! 
Have not all the great Actions that have 
been perform'd in the World been done 
by Men ? Have not they founded Em- 
pires and over-turn'd them ? Do not 
they make Laws and continually repeal 
and amend them ? Their vaft Minds lay 
Kingdoms wafte, no Bounds or Mea- 
fures can be prefcrib'd to their Defires* 
W'^ar and Peace depend on them ; they 
form Cabals and have the Wifdom and 
Courage to get over all the Rubs, the 
petty Reftraints which Honour and Con- 
fcience may lay in the Way of their de- 
fired Grandeur. What is it they cannot 
do ? They make Worlds and ruin them^ 
G form 



%i Reflections 

form Syftems of univerfal Nature, and 
difpute eternally about them ; their Pen 
gives Worth to the moft trifling Contro- 
verfy ^ nor can a Fray be inconfi(^erable 
if they have drawn their Swords in*t. 
All that the wife Man pronounces is an 
Oracle, and every Word the Witty 
fpeaks, a Jeft. It is a Woman's Happi- 
neis to hear, admire and praife them, 
efpecially if a little Ill-nature keeps them 
at any time from beftovving due Ap- 
plaufes on each other! And if fhe af- 
pires no further, fhe is thought to be in 
her proper Sphere of Action; fhe is as 
wife and as good as can be expeded 
from her ! 

She then who Marries, ought to lay it 
down for an indifputable Maxim, that 
her Husband muft govern abfolutely 
and intirely, and that flie has nothing 
clfe to do but to Pleafe and Obey. She 
muft not attempt to divide his Authori- 
ty, or fo much as difpute it ; to ftrugglc 
with her Yoke will only make it gall 
the more, but muft believe him Wife 

and 



iipon Marriage. 82 

and Good, and in all refpeds the befl:, 
at leaft he muft be fo to her. She who 
can't do this is no way fit to be a Wife, 
ihe may ^Qt up for that peculiar Coro- 
net the antient Fathers talk'd of, but is 
not qualified to receive that great Re- 
ward which attends - the eminent Exer- 
cife of Humility and Self-denial, Pa- 
tience and Refignation, the Duties that a 
Wife is caird to. 

But fbme refradory Woman perhaps 
will fay, how can this be ? Is it poflible 
for her to believe him Wife and Good, 
who by a thoufand Dcmonftrations con- 
vinces her, and all the World, of the con- 
trary ? Did the bare Name of Husband 
confer Senfe on a Man, and the meer 
being in Authority infallibly quahfy 
him for Government, much might be 
done. But fince a wife Man and a Hut- 
band are not Terms convertible, and 
how loth foever one is to own it, Mat- 
ter of Fact won't allow us to deny, that 
the Head many times Hands in need of 
the Inferior's Brains to manage it, ihe 
G a muft 



84 Reflections 

muft beg leave to be excus'd from fuch 
high Thoughts of her Sovereign, and if 
fhe fubmits to his Power, it is not fb 
much Reafon as Ncceflity that compels 
her. 

Now of how little Force foever this 
Objection may be in other refpeds, me- 
thinks it is ftrong enough to prove the 
Neceflity of a good Education, and that 
Men never miftake their true Intereft 
more than when they endeavour to keep 
Women in Ignorance. Could they in- 
deed deprive them of their Natural 
good Senfe at the fame Time they deny 
them the true Improvement of it, they 
. might compafs their End ; otherwile 
Natural Senfe unaffifted may run into a 
falfe Track, and ferve only to punifh 
him juftly, who would not allow it to 
be ufefal to himfelf or others- If Man's 
Authority be juftly eftablifh'd, the more 
Senfe a Woman has, the more Reafon 
ihe will find to fubmit to it ; if accord- 
ing to the Tradition of our Fathers, 
(who having had 'T^ojfejjion of the Pen^ 

thought 



upon Marriage. 85 

thought they had alfo the beft Right to 
it) Womens Underftanding is but fmall, 
and Man's Partiality adds no Weight to 
the Obfervation, ought not the more 
Care to be taken to improve them ? 
How it agrees with the Juftice of Men 
we inquire not, but certainly Heaven is 
abundantly more Equitable than to in- 
join Women the hardeft Task, and give 
them the leaft Strength to perform it. 
And if Men, learned, wife and difcreet 
as they are, who have, as is faid, all the 
Advantages of Nature, and without Con- 
troverfy, have, or may have, all the Af^ 
fiftance of Art, are fo faJ: from acquit- 
ting themfelves as they ought, from liv- 
ing according to that Realbn and excel- 
lent Underftanding they fo much boaft 
of, can it be expeded that a Woman 
who is reckon'd filly enough in her lelf, 
at leaft comparatively, and whom Men 
take care to make yet more {b ; can it be 
expected that fhc Ihould conftantly per- 
form fo difficult a Duty as intire Sub- 
jedion, to which corrupt Nature is fo 
jiverfe ? 

G 3 If 



86 Reflections 

I F the great and wife Cato^ a Mmi^ a 
Man of no ordinary Firmnefs and Strength 
of Mind, a Man who was efteem'd as an 
Oracle, and by the Philofophers and 
great Men of his Nation equal'd even to 
the Gods themfclvcs ; If he, with all his 
Stoical Principles, was not able to bear 
the Sight of a triumphant Conqueror 
(who perhaps would have inlulted, and 
perhaps would not) but out of a Coward- 
ly Fear of an Infult, ran to Death, to fe- 
pure him from it ; can it be thought that 
an ignorant weak Woman Ihould have 
Patience to bear a continual Outrage 
and Infolence all the Days of her Life ? 
Unlpfs you will fuppofe her a very Afs^ 
but then remember what the Italians fay, 
to quote them once more, fince being 
very Husbands they may be prefum'd to 
have fome Authority in this Cafe, An 
Jffsy though Jlowy lf^rovok*d, will kifk. 

W E never obferve, or perhaps make 
Sport, with the ill Effects of a bad Edu- 
cation, till it comes to touch us home in 

th^ 



upon Marriage. 87 

the ill Con Uift of a Sifter, a Daughter, 
or Wife. Then the Women muft be 
blam'd, their f^olly is exclaini'd againft, 
when all this while it was the wife Man's 
Fault, who did not fet a better Guard 
on thole, who, according to him, ftand 
in io much need of one. A young Gen- 
tleman, as a celebrated Author tells us, 
ought above all Things to be acquaint- 
ed with the State of the World, the 
Ways and Humours, the Follies, the 
Cheats, the Faults of the Age he is fallen 
into ; he fhould by degrees be inform'd 
of the Vice in Fafhion, and warn'd of 
the Application and Defign of thofe who 
will make it their Bufinefs to corrupt 
him, fhould be told the Arts they ufe, 
and the Trains they lay, be prepar'd to 
be Shock'd by fome, and Carefs'd by 
others; warn'd who are like to oppofe, 
who to miflead, who to undermine, and 
who to ferve him. He fliould be in- 
ftructed how to know and diftinguifh 
them, where he fhould let them fee, and 
when dilTemble the Knowledge of them 
and their Aims and Workings. Our 
G 4 Author 



88 Reflections 

Author is much in the right, and not to 
difparage any other Accomplifhments 
which are uleful in their Kind, this will 
turn to more Account than any Lan- 
guage or Philoibphy, Art or Science, or 
any other Piece of Good-breeding and 
fine Education that .can be taught him, 
which are no otherwife excellent than 
as they contribute to this, as this does 
above all Things to the making him a 
vyife, a vertuous and ufeful Man. 

And it is not lefs necefTary that a 
young Lady Jhould receive the like In- 
ftrudions, whether or no her Tempta- 
tions be fewer, her Reputation and Ho- 
nour however are to be more nicely 
preferv'd ; they may be ruin*d by a lit- 
tle Ignorarce or Indifcretion, and then 
though fhe has kept her Innocence, and 
{b is fecur'd as to the next World, ye^ 
fhe is in a great meafure loft to this. A 
Woman cannot be too watchful, too ap- 
prehenfive of her Danger, nor keep at 
too great a Diftance from it, fince Man, 
v/hofeWifdom and Ingenuity is fo much 

Superior 



upon Marriage. 8p 

Superior to hers i condefcends for his 
Intereft fometimes,- and fometimes by 
way of Divcrfion, to lay Snares for her. 
For though all Men are Firtiwjiy Philo- 
fophers and Politicians, in coniparlfbn of 
tlje ignorant and illiterate Women, yet 
they don't all pretend to be Saints, an4 
'tis no great Matter to them, if Women, 
who were born to be their Slaves, be 
now and then ruin'd for tiieir Enter-* 
tairuncnt. 

But according to the rate that young 
WcMiien are Educated, according to the 
Way their Time is fpent, they are de- 
ftin'd to Folly and Impertinence, to fay- 
no worfe, and, which is yet more inhu- 
man, they are blam'd for that ill Con«- 
dud they are not fuffer'd to avoid, and 
reproach'd for thofe Faults they are in a 
Manner forc'd into; lb that if Heaven 
has bellowed any Senfe on them, no 
other Ufe is made of it, than to leave 
them without Excufe. So much, and 
no more, of the World is Ihewn them, 
than ferves to weaken ^nd corrupt their 

Minds, 



^o Reflections 

Minds, to give them wrong Notions 
and bufy them in mean Purfuits ; to di- 
fturb, not to regulate their Paffions; to 
make them timorous and dependant, and, 
in a Word, fit for nothing elfe but to 
ad a Farce for the Diverfion of their 
Governors. 

Even Men themfelvcs improve no 
otherwifc than according to the Aim 
they take, and the End they propofe ; 
and he whofe Defigns are but little and 
mean, will be the fame himfclf. Tho' 
Ambition, as 'tis ufually underftood, is 
a foolifh, not to fay a bafe and pitiful 
Vice, yet the Afpirings of the Soul after 
true Glory are fo much its Nature, that 
it feems to have forgot it felf, and to 
degenerate, if it can forbear j and per- 
haps the great Secret of Education lies 
in affeding the Soul with a lively Senfc 
of what is truly its Perfedion, and ex- 
citing the moft ardent Defires after it. 

But, alas ! what poor Woman is ever 
taught that fhe ftiould have a higher De- 

fign 



upon Marriage. gi 

fign than to get her a Husband ? Heaven 
will fall in of courfe ; and if Ihe makes 
but an Obedient and Dutiful Wife, Ihe 
cannot mifs of it. A Husband indeed is 
thought by both Sexes fo very valuable, 
that Icarce a Man .who can keep him- 
felf clean and make a Bow, but thinks 
he is good enough to pretend to any 
Woman ; no matter for the Difference of 
Birth or Fortune, a Husband is fuch a 
Wonder-working Name as to make an 
Equality, or fomething more, whenever 
it is obtain'd. 

And indeed, were there no other 
Proof of Mafculine Wifdom, and what a 
much greater Portion of Ingenuity falls 
to the Men than to the Women's Share, 
the Addrefs, the Artifice, and Manage- 
ment of an humble Servant were a fuffi- 
cient Demonflration. What good Con- 
du£t does he fliew ! what Patience exer- 
cife ! what Subtilty leave untry'd ! what 
Concealment of his Faults ! what Parade 
of his Vertues ! what Government of hjs 
Pallions ! How deep is his Policy in lay- 
ing 



ji Reflections 

ing his Defigns at fo greata Diftance, 
and working: them up by fuch little Ac- 
cidents .' How indefatigable is his Indu- 
ftry, and how conftant his Watchfulnefs 
not to flip any Opportunity that may in 
the leaft contribute to his Defign ! What 
a handfome Set of Difguiies and Pretences 
is he always furnifh'd with ! How con- 
cealed ''does he lie ! how little pretend, 
till he is fure that his Plot will take! 
And at the fame Time that he nourifhes 
the Hope of being Lord and Mafter, ap- 
pears with all the Modefty and Submif- 
Hon of an humble and unpretending Ad- 
mirer ! 

Can a Woman then be too much up- 
on her Guard ? Can her Prudence and 
Forefighr, her early Caution, be reckoned 
unneceffary Sufpicion, or ill-bred Referve 
by any but thofe whole Defigns they 
prevent, and whofe Intereft it is to de- 
claim againft them ? It being a certain 
Maxim with the Men, though Policy or 
good Breeding won't allow them to 
ayow it always, that the Women were 

made 



npon M A R R I A G £. J)l 

made for their Sakes and Service, and 
are in all refpeds their Inferiors, efpe- 
cialiy in Underftanding ^ lb that all the 
Compliments they make, all the Addrefs 
and Complaifancc they ufe, all the Kind- 
nefs they profefs, all the Service they 
pretend to pay, has no other Meaning, 
no other End, than to get the poor Wo- 
man into their Power, to govern her ac- 
cording to their Difcretion. This is all 
pure Kindnefs indeed, and therefore no 
Woman has Reafon to be offended with 
it y for, confidcring how much fhe is 
expos'd in her own, and how fafe in 
their Keeping, 'tis the wifefl Thing ftie 
can do to put her felf under Frotedlion ! 
And then if they have a tolerable Opi- 
nion of her Senfe, and not their Vanity, 
but fbme better Principle difpofes them 
to do fomething out of the Way, and 
to appear more generous than the reft of 
their Sex, they'll condeicend to dictate 
to her, and impart fome of their Prero- 
gative, Books and Learning, 'Tis fit 
indeed, that fhe fliould intirely depend 
on their Choice, and walk with the 

Crutches 



5^4 Reflections 

Crutches they are pleas'd to lend her j 
and if fhe is furnifhed out with Ibme 
Notions to fet her a prating, I fhould 
have faid, to make her entertaining, and 
the Fiddle of the Company, her Tutor's 
Time was not ill bellowed : And it were 
a diverting Scene to fee herftript, like the 
Jay^ of her borrowed Feathers, but he, 
good Man, has not ill Nature enough 
to take Pleafure in it ! You may accufc 
him, perhaps, for giving fo much En- 
couragement to a Woman's Vanity, but 
your Accufation is groundlefs, Vanity 
being a Difeale the Sex will always be 
guilty of; nor is it a Reproach to them, 
fince Men of Learning and Senle are 
over-run with it. 

But there are few Women whofe 
Underftandings are worth the Manage- 
ment, their Eftates are much more ca- 
pable of Improvement. No Woman^ 
much lefs a Woman of Fortune, is ever 
fit to be her own Miftrefs, and he who 
has not the Vanity to think what much 
finer Things he could perform, had he 

the 



upon Marriage. 95 

the Management of her Fortune ; or fo 
much Partiality and Self-love, as to fanfy 
it can't be better beftovv'd than in making 
his ; will yet be fo honeft and humble, 
as to think that 'tis fit Ihe fhould take 
his Afiiftance, as Steward at leaft. For 
the good Man afpires no further, he 
would only take the Trouble of her Af^ 
fairs off her Hand ; and the Senfe of her 
Condefcenfion and his great Obligations, 
will for ever fecure him againft ading 
like a Lord and Maftcr. 

The Steps to Folly, as well as Sin, arc 
gradual, and almoft imperceptible, and 
when we arc once on the Decline, we go 
down without taking Notice on't ; were 
it not for this, one could not account for 
thofe Itrange unequal Marriages we too 
often fee. For there was a Time, no 
doubt, when a Woman could not have 
bore the very Thought of what fhe has 
been afterwards betray'd into • it would 
have appear'd as fhocking to her, as it 
always does to other People j and had a 
Man been fo impolitick as to difcover 

the 



p6 Reflections 

the leaft Intimation of luch a Defign, he 
had given her a fufficient Antidote 
againft it. This your wife Men are well 
fatisfied of, and underftand their own 
Intereft too well to let their DcGgn go 
bare-fac'd, for that would effedually put 
a Bar to their Succefs. So innocent arc 
they, that they had not the leaft Thought 
at firft of what their good Fortune after- 
wards leads them to ! They would draw 
upon him, (if they wear a Sword) or 
fly in her Face who fhould let fall the 
leaft Hint that they had fuch Intentions ; 
and this very Eagernefs to avoid the 
Sufpicion, is a ftirewd Sign that there is 
Occafion for*t. 

But who ftiall dare to ftiew the Lady 
her Danger, when will it be feafonable 
to give her friendly Notice ? If you do 
it ere ftie is refolv'd, though with all 
the Friendfiiip and Tendernefs imagi- 
nable, ftie will hardly forgive the Af- 
front, or bear the Provocation; you 
offer her an Outrage by entertaining fuch 
a Thought, and 'tis ten to one if you 

are 



upon Marriage* 97 

jire not afterwards accusM for putting in 
her Head what otherwife flie could ne'er 
have dreamt of. And when no direct 
Proof can be ofFer'd, when matter of 
Prudence is the only Thing in Queftion, 
every Body has fo good an Opinion of 
their own Undcrftanding, as to think 
their own Way the bell. And when 
fhe has her Innocence and fair Intentions 
to oppole your Fears and Surmifes, and 
you cannot pretend to wifh her better 
than fhe does her felf, to be more dil^ 
interefted and diligent in your Watch-t 
fulnefs, or to fee farther in what fo near- 
ly concerns her, what can be done ? 
Her Ruin is commonly too far advanced 
to be prevented, ere you can in Good- 
breeding reach out a Hand to help her* 
For if the Train has took, if fhe is in- 
tanglcd in the Snare, if Love, or rather 
a blind unreafonable Fondnels, which 
ufurps the Name of that noble Paillonj 
has gain'd on her, Rcafon and Perlua- 
fion may as properly be urg'd to the 
Folks in Bethlem^ as to her. Tell her 
of this World, fhe is got above it, and 

H has 



9^ Reflections 

has no Regard to its impertinent Gen- 
ii ires ; tell her of the next, flie laughs 
at you, and will never be convinc'd that 
Aclions which are not exprelly forbid 
can be Criminal, though they proceed 
from, and muft necefTarily be reduc'd 
to ill Principles, though they give Of- 
fence, are of ill Example, injure our 
Reputation, which, next to our Inno- 
cence, we are obliged, as Chriftians, tOi 
take the greateft Care of; and, in a 
Word, do more Mifchief than we can 
readily imagine. Tell her of her own 
Good, you appear yet more ridiculous> 
for who can judge of her Happinefs but 
her felf? And whilft our Hearts arc 
violently fct upon any thing, there is 
no convincing us that we fhall ever be 
of another Mind. Our Paffions want no 
Advocates, they are always furnifh'd 
with plaufible Pretences, and thofe very 
Prejudices, which gave rife to this un- 
leafonable Paffion, will for certain give 
her Obftinacy enough to juftify and con- 
tinue in it. Befides, Ibme are fo ill ad- 
vis'd as to think to fupport one Indif- 

cretion 



^ 



upon Marriage* ^^ 

cretion with another ; they would not 
have it thought they have made a falfe 
Step, in once giving Countenance to 
that which is not fit to be continued. 
Or perhaps the Lady might be willing 
enough to throw off the Intruder at firft, 
but wanted Courage to get above the 
Fear of his Calumnies, and the longer 
file fuffers him to buz about her, fhe will 
find ft the harder to get rid of his Im- 
portunities. By all which it appears, 
that fhe who really intends to be fecure, 
muft keep at the greateft Diftance from 
Danger, fhe muft not grant the lea/i In- 
dulgence, where fuch ill Ufes will be 
made of it. 

And fince the Cafe is fo. That Wo- 
man can never be in Safety who allows 
a Man Opportunity to betray her. Fre- 
quent Converfation does for certain pro- 
duce either Averfion or Liking, and 
when 'tis once come to Liking, it de- 
pends on the Man's Generofity not to 
improve it farther, and where can one 
find an Liftance that this is any Security ? 
H 1 There 



loo Reflections 

There are very many indeed which 
fhew it is none. How fenfible foever a 
Woman may appear of another's Indif- 
cretion, if Ihe will tread in the fame 
Steps, though but for a little Way, ftie 
gives us no Affurance that fhe will not 
fall into the fame Folly ; fhe may per- 
haps intend very well, but fhe puts it 
paft her Power to fulfil her good Inten- 
tions. Even thofe who have forfeited 
their Difcretion, the moft valuable Jewel 
next to their Vertue, and without which 
Vertue it felf is but very weak and faint, 
'tis like, were once as well refolv'd as 
file j they had the very fame Thoughts, 
they made the fame Apologies, and their 
Refentment would have been every whit 
as great againft thofe who could have 
imagined they Ihould fo far forget them- 
felves. 

It were endlefs to reckon up the di- 
vers Stratagems Men ufe to catch their 
Prey, their difTerent Ways of infinuating, 
which vary with Circumftances, and the 
Lady's Temper, but how unfairly, how 

bafely 



upon Marriage. i oi 

bafely foever they proceed, when the 
Prey is once caught, it paflcs for lawful 
Prize, and other Men having the fame 
Hopes and Projeds, fee nothing to find 
Fault with, but that it was not their 
own good Fortune. They may exclaim 
againft it perhaps in a Lady's Hearing, 
but it is only to keep themfelves from 
being fufpeded, and to give the better 
Colour to their own Defigns. Some- 
times a Woman is cajol'd, and fometimcs 
hedor'd, fhe is fcduc'd to love a Man, 
or aw'd into a Fear of him : He defends 
her Honour againft another, or affumes 
the Power of blafting it himfelf; was 
willing to pais for one of no Confe- 
quence till he could make himfelf con- 
fiderable at her Coft. He might be ad- 
mitted at firft to be her Jejij but he 
carries on the Humour iJo far till he 
makes her his ^ he will either entertain 
or fcrve her as Occafion offers, and ibme 
Way or other gets himfelf intrufted with 
her Fortune, her Fame, or her Soul. 
Allow him but a frequent and free Gon- 
vcrlation, and there's no manner of Qiie- 
H 3 ftion 



loi Reflections 

ilion but that his Ingenuity and Appli- 
cation, will, at one Time or other, get 
the Afcendant over her. 

And generally the more humble and 
undefigning a Man appears, the more 
improbable it looks that he fhould dare 
to pretend, the greater Caution ftiould be 
us*d againft him. A bold Addrefs and 
good Aflurance may fbmetimcs, but does 
not always, take. To a Woman of 
Senfe an artificial Modefty and Humility 
is a thoufand times more dangerous, for 
he only draws back to receive the more 
Encouragement, and flie regards not 
what Advances fhe makes towards him, 
who feems to underftand himfelf and the 
World fo well as to be incapable of ma- 
king an ill Ufe of them. Would it not 
be unreafonable, and a Piece of Ill- 
breeding, to be fhy of him who has no 
Pretenfions, or only fuch as are Juft and 
Modeft ? What Hurt in a Vifit ? Or what 
if yifits grow a little more frequent ? 
The Man has fb much Difcernment, as 
to relifh her Wit and Humour^ and can 

ihe 



upon Marriage. 103 

(he do lefs than be Partial to him who 
is fo Jiift to her ? He ftrives to pleafe 
and to render himfelf agreeable, or ne- 
ceflary, perhaps, and whoever will make 
it his Bufmefs, may find Ways enough 
to do it. For they know but little of 
Human Nature, they never confulted 
their own Hearts, who are not fenfible 
what Advances a well-manag'd Flattery 
makes, efpecially fromaPerfon ofwhoie 
Wit and Senie one has a good Opinion. 
His Wit at firft recommends his Flat- 
teries, and thefe, in Requital, fet off his 
Wit ; and fhe who has been us'd to 
this high-feafon'd Diet, will fcarce ever 
relilh another Converfation. 

H A v I K G got thus far, to be fure he 
is not wanting to his good Fortune, but 
drives on to an Intimacy, or what they 
are pleas'd, now a-days, though very 
unjuftly, to call a Friendfhip ; all is fafe 
under this facred Charader, which fets 
them above little Aims and mean Dc- 
figns. A Characler that mult be con- 
duded with the niceft Honour, allows 
H 4 the 



I ©4 Reflections 

the greatcft Trufts, leads to the higheft 
Improvements, is attended with the pureft 
Pleafures and moft rational Satisfadlion* 
And what if the malicious World, en- 
vious of his Happinefs, fhould take Of- 
fence at it, fince he has taken all due 
Precautions, fuch unjiift and ill-natur'd 
Cenfures are not to be regarded ; for his 
Part the Diftance that is between them 
checks all afpiring Defires, but her Con- 
verfation is what he muft not, cannot 
want : Life is infipid, and not to be en- 
dur'd without itj and he is too much 
the Lady's Friend, has too juft a Value 
for her, to entertain a Thought to her 
Difadvantage. 

Now if once it is come to this, God 
help the poor Woman ! for not much 
Service can be done her by any of her 
Friends on Earth. That Pretender, to 
be fure, will be the Darling, he will 
worm out every other Perfon, though 
ever fo kind and dilinterefted. For tho' 
true Friends will endeavour to pleafe in 
prdpr to ferve, their Gomplaifance never 
? goes 



) -' 



upon Marriage. loy 

goes fb far as to prove injurious ; the 
beloved Fault is what they chiefly ftrike 
at, and this the Flatterer always fooths \ 
fo that at laft he becomes the moft ac- 
ceptable Company, and they who are 
confcious of their own Integrity, are not 
apt to bear fuch an unjuft Diftindion, 
nor is it by this Time to any Purpofe to 
remonftrate the Danger of fuch an In- 
timacy. When a Man, and for certain 
much more when a Woman, is fallen in- 
to this Toil, that is, when either have 
been lb unwary and indifcreet as to let 
another find out by what Artifices he 
may manage their Self-love, and draw 
it over to his Party, 'tis too late for any- 
one who is really their Friend, to break 
the Snare and difabufe them. 

Neither Sex cares to deny them- 
felves that which pleafes, efpecially 
when they think they may innocently 
indulge it ; and nothing pleafes more 
than the being Admir'd and Humour'd. 
We may be told of the Danger, and 
(hewn the Fall of others, but though 

their 



\o6 Reflections 

their Misfortunes arc ever fo often of fo 
lively reprefented to us, we are all fo 
well aflur'd of our own good Condud, 
as to believe it will bring us fafe off 
thofe Rocks on which others have been 
Shipwrecked. We fuppofe it in our 
Power to fhorten the Line of our Li- 
berty whenever we think fit, not con- 
fidering that the farther we run, we fhall 
be the more unwilling to retreat, and 
unable to judge when a Retreat is necef- 
fary. A Woman does not know that 
ihe is more than half loft when fhe ad- 
mits of thefe Suggeftions ; that thofe Ar- 
guments ftie brings for continuing a 
Man's Converfation, prove only that Ihe 
ought to have quitted it fooner^ that 
Liking infenfibly converts to Love, and 
that when Ihe admits a Man to be her 
Friend, 'tis his Fault if he does not make 
^limfelf her Husband. 

And if Men, even the Modefteftand 
the Beft, are only in purfuit of their own 
Defigns, when they pretend to do the 
Lady Service • if the Honour they 

\v0ui4 



I 



upon Marriage, lo;^ 

would feem to do her, tends only to lead 
her into an imprudent, and therefore a 
diftionourable A(^ion ; and they have 
all that good Opinion of themfelves as 
to take every thing for Encouragement, 
Co that fhc who goes beyond a bare Ci- 
vility, though fhe meant no more than 
Refped, will find it interpreted a Favour, 
and made ill Ufe of, (for Favours, how 
innocent foever, never turn to a Lady's 
Advantage) what Shadow of a Pretence 
can a Woman have for admitting an In- 
timacy with a Man, whofc Principles 
are known to be Loofe, and his Pradices 
Licentious ? can fhe exped to be fafe 
with him who has ruin'd others, and 
by the very fame Methods he takes with 
her ? If an Intimacy with a Man of a 
fair Characler gives Offence, with a Man 
of an ill one, 'tis doubly and trebly 
fcandalous. And luppofe neither her 
Fortune nor Beauty can tempt him, he 
has his ill-natur'd Pleafure in deftroying 
that Vertue he will not pradife, or if 
that can't be done, in blafting the Re- 
putation of it at leaft, and in making 

the 



to8 Reflections 

the World believe he has made a Con- 
queft, though he has found a Foil. 

If the Man be the Woman's Inferior, 
bcfides all the Dangers formerly men- 
tioned, and thofejuft now taken Notice 
of, fhe gives fuch a Countenance to his 
Vices, as renders her in great meafure. 
Partaker in them ; and, it can fcarce be 
thought in fuch Circumftances, a Wo- 
man could like the Man if Ihe were not 
reconciled to his Faults. Is he her 
Equal, and no unfuitable Match, if his 
Defigns are fair, why don't they Marry, 
fince they are fo well pleased with each 
other's Converfation, which in this State 
only can be frequently and fafely al- 
low'd ? Is he her Better, and fhe hopes, 
by catching him, to make her Fortune, 
alas ! the poor Woman is neither ac- 
quainted with the World nor her felf ; 
fhe neither knows her own Weaknefs, 
nor his Treachery, and though he gives 
her ever fo much Encouragement to 
this vain Hope, 'tis only in order to ac-p 
coraplifh her Ruin. To be fure the 

mo^e 



upon Marriage. 109 

more Freedom flie allows, the more ftie 
leflens his Efteem, and that*s not likely 
to increafe a real, though it may a pre- 
tended Kindnefs ; Ihe ought to fly, if 
file would have him purfue, the ftrideft 
Vertue and Referye being the only Way 
to fecure him. 

Religion and Reputation are fo 
fure a Guard, fuch a Security to poor 
dcfencelefs Woman, that whenever a 
Man has ill Defigns on her, he is fure to 
make a Breach into one or both of thefe, 
by endeavouring either to corrupt her 
Principles, to make her Icfs ftrid in De- 
votion, or to leffen her Value of a fair 
Reputation, and would perfuade her, 
that lefs than fhe imagines will fecure 
her as to the next World, and that not 
much Regard is to be given to the Cen- 
fures of this. Or if this be too bold at 
firfl, and will not pafs with her, he has 
another Way to make even her Love to 
Vertue contribute to its Ruin, by per- 
fuading her it never fhines as it ought, 
unlefs it is expos'd, and that fhe has no 

Reafon 



iio Reflections 

Reafbn to boaft of her Vertue unlefs flie 
has try*d it. An Opinion of the worft 
Gonfequence that may be, and the moft 
mifchievous to a Woman, becaufe it is 
calculated to feed her Vanity, and tends 
indeed to her utter Ruin. For, can it 
be fit to rufh into ' Temptations, when' 
we are taught every Day to pray againft 
them ? If the Trials of our Vertue render 
it illuftrious, 'tis fuch Trials as Heaven 
is pleased to fend us, not thofe of our 
own feeking. It holds true of both 
Sexes, that next to the Divine Grace a 
modeft Diftruft of thcmfelves is their 
beft Security, none being fo often and 
lb fhamcfully foil'd, as thofe who de- 
pend moft on their own Strength and 
Refolution. 

A s to the Opinion of the World, tho* 
one cannot fay 'tis always juft, yet ge- 
nerally it has a Foundation, great Re- 
gard is to be paid to it, and very good 
Ufe to be made of it. Others may be in 
Fault for pafling their Cenfures, but we 
certainly are fo, if we give them any the 

Icaft 



J 



>w 



upon Marriage: i i i 

leaft juft Occafion. And fince Reputa- 
tion is not only one of the Rewards of 
Vertue, that which always ought, and 
generally does attend it, but alfb a Guard 
againft Evil, an Inducement to Good, 
and a great Inllrument in the Hand of 
the Wife to promote the common Caufc 
of Vertue ^ the being Prodigal of the 
one, looks as if we fet no great Value 
on the other, and fhe who abandons her 
good Name, is not like to preferve her 
Innocence. 

A Woman therefore can never have 
too nice a Senfe of Honour, provided 
file does not prefer it before her Duty ; 
file can never be too careful to fecure 
her Charader, not only from the Sulpi- 
cion of a Crime, but even from the 
Shadow of an Indifcretion. 'Tis well 
worth her while to renounce the moft 
Entertaining, and, what fome perhaps, 
will call the moft Improving Company, 
rather than give the World a juft Occa- 
fion of Sufpicion or Cenfure. For be- 
fides the Injury that is done Religion, 
2 which 



i 1 i Reflections 

which enjoins us to avoid the very Ap* 
pearance of Evil, and to do nothing but 
what is of good Report, flie puts her 
felf too much in a Man's Power, who 
will run fuch a Rifque for his Converfa- 
tion, and expreffes fuch a Value for him, 
as cannot fail of being made ufe of to do 
her a Mifchief. 

Preserve your Diftance then, keep 
out of the Reach of Danger, fly if you 
would be fafe, be fure to be always on 
the Referve, not fuch as is Morofe and 
AfFeded, but Modeft and Difcreet, your 
Caution cannot be too great, nor your 
Forefight reach too far ; there's nothing, 
or what is next to nothing, a little A- 
mufement and entertaining Converfation, 
loft by this, but all is hazarded by the 
other. A Man underftands his own 
Merit too well to lofe his Time in a 
Woman's Companyj were it not to di- 
vert himfelf at her Coft, to turn her in- 
to a Jcft, or fomething worfe. And 
where-ever you fee great Afliduities, when 
a Man infinuates into the Diverfions and 

Humours 



tipon Marriage. 1 1 j 

Humours of the Lady, liking and ad- 
miring whatever ihe does, though at the 
fame Time he feems to keep a due Di- 
ftance, or rather exceeds in the pro- 
foundeft Refped ; Rcfpe6l being all he 
dare at prefent pretend to : when a more 
than ordinary Deference is paid ; when 
fbmething particular appears in the Look 
and Addrefs, and fuch an Obfequioul^ 
nefs in every Action, as nothing could 
engage a Man to, who never forgets the 
Superiority of his Sex, but a Hope to be 
obfcrv'd in his Turn : Then, whatever 
the Inequality be, and how fenfible fo- 
ever he feems to be of it, the Man has 
for certain his Engines at work, the Mine 
is ready to be fprung on the firft Oppor- 
tunity, and 'tis well if it be not too late 
to prevent the poor Lady's Ruin, 

To wind up this Matter; If a Wo- 
man were duly principled, and taught to 
know the World, efpecially the true 
Sentiments that Men have of her, and 
the Traps they lay for her under i^Q 
-many gilded Compliments, and fuch % 
I feemingly 



»u 



Reflections 

feemingly great Refped, that Difgracc 
would be prevented which is brought 
upon too many Families; Women would 
Marry more difciectly , and demean 
themfelves better in a married State, than 
fomc People fay they do. The Foun- 
dation, indeed, ought to be laid deep 
and ftrong, fhc fhould be made a good 
Chriftian, and underftand why Ihe is fo, 
and then Ihe will be every thing elfe 
that is Good. Men need keep no Spies 
on a Woman's Conduct, need have no 
Fear of her Vertue, or fo much as of her 
Prudence and Caution, were but a due 
Senfe of true Honour and Vertue awa- 
ken'd in her; were her Reafon excited 
and prepared to confider the Sophiftry of 
thofe Temptations which would per- 
fuade her from her Duty ; and were ihe 
put in a way to know that it is both her 
Wifdom and Intereft to obferve it : fhe 
would then duly examine and weigh all 
the Circumftances, the Good and Evil 
of a married State, and not be furprized 
with unforefeen Inconveniencies, and 
•cither never confent to be a Wife, or 

mkicc 



upon A1!arriage. iiy 

inake a good one when fhe does. This 
would fhcw her what Human Nature /Vj 
as well as what it ought to be, and teach 
her not only what fhe may juftly expect, 
but what fhe muft be content with ; 
would enable her to cure fbme Faults, 
and patiently to illfFer what fhe cannot 
cure. 

Indeed nothing can alTure Obedi- 
ence, and render it what it ought to be, 
but the Confcience of Duty, the paying 
it for God's fake. Superiors don't right- 
ly underftand their own Intereft when 
they attempt to put out their Subjeds 
Eyes to keep them Obedient. A blind 
Obedience is what a Rational Creature 
fhould never pay, nor would fuch an 
one receive it, did he rightly underftand 
its Nature. For Human Adions are no 
otherwife valuable, than as they are con*. 
formable to Reafon ; but a blind Obe- 
dience is an Obeying without Reafon^ 
for ought wc know, againji it. God 
himfelf does not require our Obedience 
at this rate ; he lays before us the Good- 
J. a iiefs 



ii6 Reflections 

ncfs and Reafonablenefs of his Laws, 
and were there any thing in them whofe 
Equity we could not readily compre- 
hend, yet we have this clear and fuffi- 
cient Reafon, on which, to found our 
Obedience, that nothing but what's juft 
and fit, can be enjbin'd by a Juft, a 
Wife, and Gracious God; but this is a 
Realbn will never hold in relped of 
Mens Commands, unlefs they can prove 
themfelves Infallible, and confequently 
Impeccable too. 

It is therefore very much a Man's 
Intereft, that Women fliould be good 
Chriftians ; for in this, as in every other 
Inftance, he who does his Duty, finds his 
own Account in it. Duty and true In- 
tereft are one and the fame Thing, and 
he who thinks otherwife is to be pitied 
for being fo much in the Wrong : But 
what can be more the Duty of the Head> 
than to inftrud and improve thofe who 
are under Government ? She will freely 
leave him the quiet Dominion of this 
W^orld, whofe Thoughts and Expeda- 
y tions 



^.iipon Marriage. 117 

tions are plac'd on the next. A Profped 
of Heaven, and that only, will cure that 
Ambition which all generous Minds are 
fill'd with, not by taking it away, but 
by placing it on a right Objed. She 
will difcern a Time when her Sex Ihall 
be no Bar to the belt Employments, the 
higheft Honour ; a Time when that Di- 
ftindion, now fo much usM to her Pre- 
judice, fhall be no more ; but, provided 
file is not wanting to her felf, her Soul 
fhall fhine as bright as the greateft He- 
roe's. This is a true, and indeed, the 
only Confolation ; this makes her a fuffi- 
cient Compeniation for all the Negled 
and Contempt the ill-grounded Cuftoms 
of the World throw on her ; for all the 
Injuries brutal Power may do her, and 
is a fufficient Cordial to fupport her Spi- 
rits, be her Lot in this World what it 
may. 

But fome fagc Perfbns may, per- 
haps objcd, that were Women allow'd 
to improve themfelves, and not, amongft 
other Difcouragements, driven back by the 
I 3 wife 



Il8 Reflections 

wife Jefts and ScofFs that are put upon a 
Woman of Senfe or Learning, a Philofo- 
phical Lady, as fhc is call'd by way of 
Ridicule ; they would be too wife, and 
too good for the Men: I grant it, for 
vicious and foolifh Men. Nor is it to 
be wonder'd that He is afraid he Ihonld 
not be able to Govern them were their 
Underflandings improved, who is re- 
folv^d not to take too much Pains with 
his own. But thefe, 'tis to be hoped, 
are no very confiderable Number, the 
Foolifh at leaft j and therefore this is fo 
far from being an Argument againft 
Womens Improvement, that it is a ftrong 
©ne for it, if we do but fuppofe the Men 
to be as capable of Improvement as the 
Women ; but much more, if, according 
to Tradition, we believe they have 
greater Capacities. This, if any thing, 
would flir them up to be what they 
ought, and not permit them to wafte 
their Time and abufe their Faculties in 
the Service of their irregular Appetites 
and unreafonable Defires, and fo let. 
poor contemptible Women, who have 

beei) 



^..upon Marriage. 1 1^ 

h^zn their Slaves, excel them in all that 
is truly excellent. This would make 
them Blufh at employing an immortal 
Mind no better than in making Provi- 
fion for the Flefh to fulfil the Lulls 
thereof, fmce Women, by a wifer Con- 
dud, have brought themfelves to fuch 
a Reach of Thought, to fuch Exadnefs 
of Judgment, fuch Clearnefs and Strength 
of Rcafoiiing, fuch Purity and Elevation 
of Mind, fuch Command of their Pal- 
lions, fuch Regularity of Will and Af- 
fedion, and, in a Word, to fuch a Pitch 
of Perfection, as the Human Soul is ca- 
pable of attaining in this Life by the 
Grace of G o d ; fuch true Wifdom, fuch 
real Grcatnefs, as though it does not 
qualify them to make a Noife in this 
World, to found or overturn Empires, 
yet it qualifies them for what is infinite- 
ly better, a Kingdom that cannot be 
mov'd, an incorruptible Crown of Glory. 

Besides, it were ridiculous to fup- 

pofe, that a Woman, were Ihe ever fo 

much ,improv'd, could come near the 

I 4 topping 



110 Reflections 

topping Genius of the Men, and there- 
fore why Ihoiild they envy or difcourage 
her ? Strength of^ Mind goes along with 
Strength of Body, and 'tis only forfome 
odd Accidents which Philofophers have 
not yet thought worth while to enquire 
into, that the fturdieft Porter is not the 
wifeft Man ! As therefore the Men have 
the Power in their Hands, fo there's no 
Difpute of their having the Brains to 
manage it I Can wc fuppofe there is fuch 
a Thing as good Judgment and Senfe 
Upon Earth, if it is not to be found 
among them: Do not they, generally 
Ipeaking, do all the great Adions and 
confiderable Bufinefs of this World, and 
leave that of the next to the Women? 
Their Subtlety in forming Cabals and 
laying deep Defigns, their Courage and 
Conduct in breaking through all Tyes, 
(acred and civil, to effecl them, not only 
advances them to the Poll: of Honour, 
and keeps them fccurely in it for twenty 
or thirty Years, but gets them a Name, 
and conveys it down to Pofterity for 
£oinc Hundreds j and who would look 

any 



upon Marriage. 121 

any further ? Jiiftice and Injuftice are 
adminiftred by their Hands, Courts and 
Schools are filled with thefe Sages ; 'tis 
Men who difpute for Truth, as well as 
Men who argue againft it : Hiftories are 
writ by them ; they recount each other's 
great Exploits, and have always done 
fb. All famous Arts have their Original 
from Men, even from the Invention of 
Guns, to the Myftery of good Eating. 
And to fhew that nothing is beneath 
their Care, any more than above their 
Reach, they have brought Gamijig to 
an Art and Science, and a more Profit- 
able and Honourable one too, than any 
of thofe that us'd to be call'd Liberal! 
Indeed, what is it they can't perform, 
when they attempt it ? The Strength of 
their Brains Ihall be every whit as con- 
fpicuous at their Cups, as in a Senate-i 
Houfe, and, when theypleafe, they can 
make it pafs for as fure a Mark of Wif- 
dom, to drink deep, as to reafon pro- 
foundly ; a greater Proof of Courage, 
and confcquently of Underftanding, to 
dare the Vengeance of Heaven it felf, 

than 



122 R E F L E C T I O N- S. 

than to ftand the Raillery of fome of the 
worft of their Fellow Creatures ! 

A G A I N, it may be faid, If a Wife's 
Cafe be as it is here reprefented, it is 
not good for a Woman to marry, and 
fo there's an End of Human Race. But 
this is no fair Confequence, for all that 
can juftly be inferr'd from hence, is, 
that a Woman has no mighty Obliga- 
tions to the Man who makes Love to 
her j file has no Reafon to be fond of 
being a Wife, or to reckon it a Piece of 
Preferment when fhe is taken to be a 
Man's Upper-Servant; it is no Advan- 
tage to her in this World j if rightly 
manag'd it may prove one as to the 
next. For ilie who marries purely to 
do good, to educate Souls for Heaven, 
who can be fo truly mortified as to lay 
afide her own Will and Defires, to pay 
fuch an intire Subniiflion for Life, to 
one whom fhe cannot be fure will al- 
ways deferve it, does certainly perform 
a more Herolck Ad:ion, than all the fa-? 

mous 



upon Marriage. 1 2 j 

mous Mafciiline Heroes can boaft of, 
ftie lufFers a continual Martyrdom to 
bring Glory to God, and Benefit to 
Mankind j which Confideration, indeed> 
may carry her through all Difficulties, 
I know not what elfe can, and engage 
her to Love him who proves perhaps 
fo much worfc than a Brute, as to make 
this Condition yet more grievous than it 
needed to be. She has need of a ftrong 
Reafon, of a truly Chriftian and well- 
temper'd Spirit, of all the Afliftance the 
beft Education can give her, and ought 
to have fome good Affurance of her own 
Firmnels and Vertue, who ventures on 
fuch a Trial ; and for this Realbn 'tis 
lels to be wonder'd at that Women 
marry off in hafle, for perhaps if they 
took Time to confider and reflccl upon 
it, they feldom would marry. 

T o conclude. Perhaps Tve faid more 
than moft Men will thank me forj I 
cannot help it, for how much Ibever I 
piay be their Friend and humble Ser- 
vant* 



124 Reflection's 

vant, I am more a Friend to Truth. 
Truth is ftrong, and fome time or other 
will prevail ; nor is it for their Honour 
and therefore one would think not for 
their Intereft, to be partial to them- 
felves and unjuft to others. They may- 
fancy I have made fome Difcoveries, 
which, like Arcana Imperii^ ought to be 
kept fecret; but, in good earneft, I do 
them more Honour than to fuppofe their 
lawful Prerogatives need any mean Arts 
to flipport them. If they have ufurp^d, 
I love Juftice too much to wifh Succefs 
and Continuance to Ufurpations, which? 
though fubmitted to out of Prudence, 
and for Quietnefs fake, yet leave every- 
body free to regain their lawful Right 
whenever they have Power and Oppor- 
tunity. I don't fay that Tyranny ought^ 
but we find in Fati^ that it provokes 
the OpprefsM to throw off even a law- 
ful Yoke that fits too heavy : And if he 
who is freely eleded, after all his fair 
Promifes, and the fine Hopes he raised, 
prove-6 a Tyrant, the Confidcration that 

he 



upon Marriage. 125 

he was one's own Choice, will not render 
one more Submiflive and Patient, but I 
fear, more Refradory. For though it 
is very unreafonable, yet we fee 'tis the 
Courfe of the World, not only to return 
Injury for Injury, but Crime for Crime ; 
both Parties indeed are Guilty, but the 
Aggreffors have a double Guilt, they 
have not only their own, but their 
Neighbour's Ruin to anfwer for. 

A s to the Female Reader, I hope fhe 
will allow I've endeavoured to do her 
Juftice ; not betray'd her Caufe as her 
Advocates ufually do, under Pretence of 
defending it. A Pradice too mean for 
any to be guilty of who have the leaft 
Stn^c of Honour, and who do anv more 
than meerly pretend to it. I think I 
have held the Balance even, and not 
being confcious of Partiality, I ask no 
Pardon for it. To plead for the Op- 
prefs'd, and to defend the Weak, feem'd 
to me a generous Undertaking ; for 
though it may be fecure, 'tis not al- 

wavs 



11^ Reflections 

ways Honourable, to run over to the 
ftrongeft Party. And if Ihe infers from 
what has been faid, that Marriage is a 
very happy State for Men, if they think 
fit to make it fo ; that they govern the 
World, they have Prefcription on their 
Side ; Women are too weak to difpute 
it with them, therefore they, as all other 
Governors, are moft, if not only, ac- 
countable for what's amifs ; for whe- 
ther other Governments in their Origi- 
nal, were or were not confer'd accord- 
ing to the Merit of the Perfon, yet cer- 
tainly in this Cafe, if Heaven has ap- 
pointed the Man to govern, it has Qiia- 
lified him for it : So far I agree with 
her : But if fhe goes on to infer, that 
therefore, if a Man has not thefe Qua- 
lifications, where is his Right ? That if 
he mifemploys, he abufes it ? And if he 
abufes, according to modern Deduction, 
he forfeits it, I muft leave her there. A 
peaceable Woman, indeed, will not car- 
ry it fo far, fhe will neither queftion her 
Husband's Right, nor his Fitnefs to 

govern. 



upon M A R R I A G F. 1 2/ 

govern, but how? Not as an abfolute 
Lord and Mailer, with an arbitrary and 
tyrannical Sway, but as Reafon go- 
verns and conduds a Man, by propofing 
what is juft and fit. And the Man who 
ads according to that Wifdom he af- 
fumes, who would have that Superiority 
he pretends to, acknowledged juft, will 
receive no Injury by any thing that has 
been offered here. A Woman will value 
Him the more who is io wife and good, 
when Ihe dilcerns how much he excels 
the reft of his noble Sex j the lefs he re- 
quires, the more will he merit that 
Efteem and Deference, which thofc who 
are fo forward to exad, feem confcious; 
they don't deferve. So then the Man's 
Prerogative is not at all infring'd, whilft 
the Woman's Privileges are fecured ; and 
if any Woman think her felf injur'd, 
ftie has a Remedy in refer ve, which few 
Men will envy, or endeavour to rob her 
of, the Exercife and Improvement of 
her Vertue Here, and the Reward of it 
Hereafter. 

W K 5 >: 



1x8 Reflections 

When I made thefe Reflexions, I 
was of Opinion, that the Cafe of married 
Women, in compariion of that of their 
Husbands, was not a little hard and un- 
equal. But as the World now goes, I 
am apt to think, thit a Husband is in 
no defirable Situation ; his Honour is in 
his Wife's keeping, and what Man of 
Honour can be fatisfied with the Con- 
duct which the Licentioufnefs of the Age 
not only permits, but would endeavour 
to authorize as a Part of good Breeding? 
And what makes his Cafe the worfe, he 
muft diflemble his Uneafinefs, ftifle his 
Refentments, and not dare to take the 
proper Methods of preventing and curing 
the Diforder. 

So great is our Corruption, that fuch 
as pretend to make a true Eftimate of 
Human Life, and very freely Satirize 
both Sexes for lefler Crimes, are not 
afham'd to recommend this, prefcribing 
a known Sin as a Cure for what is not 

abfo- 



I 



upon Marriage, up 

ablblutely unlawful in it felf, though 
very pernicious in its Confequences, when 
carried to Excefs. 

Not that I would in any manner apo- 
logize for Gamin'g, which, when carried to 
Excefs, is ruinous to both Sexes, efpecial- 
ly to Women ; who, when given to this 
Vice, difregard their Husbands, and Oeco- 
nomy, neglect the Education of their 
Children, fpend their Fortunes as much 
as they can, and, which is not the leail 
Inconveniency, when they lofe to Men 
more than they are able to pay, they 
give iheir Creditor Opportunity to make 
infolent Demands. But fure, any Huf^ 
band, who is not funk to the loweft 
Degree of Infamy, had rather his Wife 
ihould wafte his Money at .^ladrllle^ 
than Intrigue with a ColoneL If Sin yott 
ma ft (fays an admirable Author, whofe 
Panegyricks arc Satires, and his Satires 
Panegyricks) 

m take Nature for your Guides 

Love has fome foft Ex cafe to footh your 
Pride, 

K Can 



ijo Reflections 

Can wc read this excellent Advice 
of this very moral Satirift , without re- 
mcmbring what the Pfalmijl fays of 
fbme of his Cotemporaries ; When thou 
fawejl a I'hlef thou confe'ntedjl unto him^ 
and haft been Partaker with the Adultery ? 
For, fure of all other Thieves he is the 
moft criminal, who (under Pretence of 
Friendftiip, perhaps) robs a Man of his 
moft valued Effeds, deprives him of his 
Honour, and of the Quiet and Comfort 
of his Life. 

Nature and Love, as they, injurl- 
oufly to both, mifcall their brutal Appe- 
tite, are very different from what our 
Author would reprefent them. Variety 
by no Means anfwers the End of Na- 
ture in providing for Pofterity. And 
enough has been faid, to fhew, that 
fuch Profeflions of Love are moil abufive, 
and the Effed of their Paffion the moft out- 
rageous Injury that Hatred can produce: 
A Woman is never fo eftedually humble^ 



upon Marriage. 13 

ais the Scripture elegantly exprefles it, 
than when a Man obtains his Defircs. 
And if Ihe confents, Ihe renders her felf 
defpicable in his Eyes as well as in the 
Eyes of others. Thus the Engltfo Mufe 
very truly fings : 

** 7'hat wretched She, who yields to guilty 

" Joyu 

*' ^ Man 7nay Pity, hut he must Defpife^ 

Whoever makes a true Eftimate 
of Chriftianity, who does not profefs it, 
becaufe as yet, 'tis the Religion of his 
Country, or for his Interefl, or fome 
fuch worthy Motive ; but upon full 
Convidion of its Divine Authority^ 
which he cannot want if he examines 
impartially, as a Matter of this Confe- 
qucnce defer ves ; fuch a Man will find 
Chriftianity requires the ftrideft Purity 
of Heart and Imagination, fincc in the 
thickcft Darknefs our Thoughts, as well 
as our Actions, are manifeft to our Judge ^ 
and, that whoever looks upon a Wo- 
/ K a man 



12Z Reflections, &c, 

man to Lull after her, has committed 
Adultery with her already in his 
Heart. 

Horfes and Bulls ^ and all the J^rutal Kind, 
Kange oet the Field, to no one She confind, 
^bey know not Love, for Love is in the Mind. 
S'hefe following Nature are exempt from Blame^ 
Unconfcious or of Guilt, Kemorfe and Shame. 

But Man, unhappy Man ! puts out his Light, 
Keafon for fakes, to follow Appetite. 
Sinks down to Brute, and labours hut in vain, 
S'o he like them, without Remorfe or Shame ^^ 
^0 Guilt, inevitably follows Pain. 
No Deeds ofDarknefs are conceal* dhy Night,' 
He fees IVho dwells in everlafting Light, 
And ev^ry Thought is open to His Sight. 



APPEN- 



( ■» ) 



APPENDIX. 




I H E Rejle^or^ who hopes 
Reff^tfor is not bad EngViJIh 
(now Governor is happily of 
the Feminine Gender) guard- 
ed againft Curiofity in vain : For a 
certain ingenuous Gentleman, as Ihe is 
informed, had the Good-nature to own 
thefc Refledions, fo far, as to affirm that 
he had the Original MS. in his Clofet, a 
Proof fhe is not able to produce • and fo 
to make himfelf rcfponfible for all their 
Faults, for which, fhe returns him ail 
due Acknowledgment. However, the 
Generality being of Opinion, that a Man 
would have had more Prudence and 
Manners than to have Publifh'd fuch 
K 3 unfca- 



»j4 APPENDIX. 

unfeafbnable Truths, or to have betray'd 
the Arcana Imperii of his Sex ^ flie hum- 
bly confeiTes, that the Contrivance and 
Execution ©f this Defign, which is un- 
fortunately accus'd of being fo deftru- 
dive to the Governmenty''(of the Men, 
I mean) is intirely her own. She nei- 
ther advis'd with Friends, nor turn'd 
over antient or modern Authors, nor 
prudently fubmitted to the Corredion of ^ 
fuch as are, or fuch as think they arc 
good Judges, but with an EngViJh Spirit 
and Genius, fet out upon the Forlorn 
Hope, meaning no Hiirt to any body, 
nor defigning any thing but the publick 
Good, and to retrieve, if poffible, the 
Native Liberty, the Rights and Privi- 
leges of the Subjed. 

F A R be it from her to ftir up Sedition 
of any fort : none can abhor it more ; 
and fhe heartily wifhes, that our Matters 
would pay their Civil and Ecclefiaftical 
Governors the fame Submiflion, which 
ihey themfelves exact from their Do- 

meftick 



APPENDIX. tj5 

mcftick Subje£ls. Nor can fhe imagine 
how fhe any way undermines the Mas- 
culine Empire, or blows the Trumpet 
of Rebellion to the Moiety of Mankind. 
Is it by exhorting Women, not to ex- 
peft to have their own Will in any 
thing, but to be intirely Submiflive, 
when once they have made Choice of a 
Lord and Mafter, though he happen 
not to be fo wile, fo kind, or even fb 
juft a Governor as was expeded ? She 
did not, indeed, advife them to think 
his Folly Wifdom, nor his Brutality, 
that Love and Worfhip he promifed 
in his Matrimonial Oath ; for this re- 
quired a FHght of Wit and Senfe much 
above her poor Ability, and proper only 
to Mafculine Underftandings. However, 
fhe did not in any manner prompt them 
to Refift, or to Abdicate the Pcrjur'd 
Spoufe, though the Laws of God, and 
the Land, make fpecial Provifion for it, 
in a Cafe, wherein, as is to be fear'd, 
few Men can truly plead Not Guilty. 

K 4 *Tis 



1^6 A P P E N D I X. 

'Tis true, through want of Lcarn- 
i/ig, and of that Superior Genius which 
Men, as Men, lay claim to, Ihe was igno- 
rant of the Natural Inferiority of our Sex, 
which our Mailers lay down as a Self- 
evident and Fundamental Truth. She 
favv nothing in the Reafon of Things, 
to make this either a Principle or a Con- 
cluiion, but much to the contrary ; it 
being Sedition at Icaft, if not Treafon, to 
aflert it in this Reign. For if by the 
Natural Superiority of their Sex, they 
mean, that every Man is by Nature fu- 
perior to every Woman, which is the ob- 
vious Meaning, and that which muft be 
ftuck to if they would fpeak Senfe, it 
would be a Sin in any Woman, to have 
Dominion over any Man, and the great- 
eft Queen ought not to command, but 
to obey, her Footman : becaufe no Mu- 
nicipal Laws can fuperfede or change 
the Law of Nature : So that if the Do- 
minion of the Men be fuch, the SaUque 
Law, as unjuft as Engl/fh Men have ever 
thought it, ought to take Place over all 

the 



Appendix. 137 

the Earth, and the moft glorious Reigns 
in the Enghjh^ Damjh^ Caft'dian, and 
other Annals, were wicked Violations 
of the Law of Nature ! 

If they mean that fome Men are fu- 
perior to Jonie Women, this is no great 
Difcovery ; had they turn'd the Tables, 
they might have feen ih.2Xfome Women 
are iuperior iofome Men. Or had they 
been pleafed to remember their Oaths of 
Allegiance and Supremacy, they might 
have known, that One Woman is fupe- 
rior to j4ll the Men in thefe Nations, or 
clfe they have fworn to very little Pur- 
pofe. And it muft not be fuppos'd, 
that their Reafbn and Religion would 
fufFcr them to take Oaths, contrary to 
the Law of Nature and Reafon of 
Things. 

By all which it appears, that our Re- 
fiedor's Ignorance is very pitiable ; it 
may be her Misfortune, but not her 
Clime, efpecially fince fhe is willing to 
be better informed, and hopes ihe fhall 

never 



138 APPENDIX. 

never be fo obftinate as to fhut her Eyes 
againft the Light of Truth, which is not 
to be charged with Novelty, how late 
fbever we may be blcfs'd with the Dil^ 
covery. Nor can Error, be it as an- 
tient as it may, ever plead Prefcription 
againft Truth. And fincc the only way 
to remove all Doubts, to anfwer all Ob- 
jedions, and to give the Mind entire 
Satisfaction, is not by Affirmngy but by 
Provingy fo that every one may fee with 
their own Eyes, and judge according to 
the beft of their own Underftandings ; 
Ihe hopes it is no Prefumption to infift 
on this Natural Right of Judging for 
her felf, and the rather, becaufe by 
quitting it, we give up all the Means of 
Rational Convidion. Allow us then as 
many Glafles as you pleafe to help our 
Sight, and as many good Arguments as 
you can afford to convince our Under* 
Handings : But don't cxad of us, we be- 
feech you, to affirm that we fee fuch 
Things as are only the Difcovery of Men 
who have quicker Senfes ; or, that we 
underftand, and know what we have by 



APPENDIX. 139 

Hear- fay only; for to be {o exceflively 
Complaifant, is neither to fee nor to nn- 
derftand. 

That the Cuftotn of the World, has 
put Women, generally fpeaking, into a 
State of Subjedion, is not denied ; but 
the Right can no more be prov'd from 
the Fad, than the Predominancy of Vice 
can juftify it. A certain great Man, has 
endeavour'd to prove, by Reafons not 
contemptible, that in the Original State 
of Things the Woman was the Superior, 
and that her Subjection to the Man is an 
Effed of the Fall, and the Punifhment 
of her Sin : And, that ingenious Theo- 
rift Mr. //7j///c;«, aflerts, That before 
the Fall there was a greater Equality 
between the two Sexes. However this 
be, 'tis certainly no Arrogance in a Wo- 
man to conclude, that (lie was made for 
the Service of God, and that this is her 
End. Becaufe God made all Things 
for Himfelf, and a rational Mind is too 
^oble a Being to be made for the Sake 
and Service of any Creature. The Ser- 
vice 



140 APPENDIX. 

vice fhe at any Time becomes obligM tO 
pay to a Man, is only a Bufinefs by the 
Bye, juft as it may be any Man's Bufinefs 
and Duty to keep Hogs; he was not Made 
for this, but if he Hires himfelf out to 
fuch an Employment, he ought confci* 
entioufly to perform it. Nor can any 
thing be concluded to the contrary from 
St. Paul's Argument, i Cor. xi. for he 
argues only for Decency and Order, ao* 
cording to the preient Cuftom and State 
of Things : Taking his Words ftridly 
and literally, they prove too much, in 
that, Praying and ^rophe eying in tht 
Church are allowed the Women, pro- 
vided they do it with their Head covered 
as well as the Men \ and no Inequality 
can be inferred from hence, neither from 
the Gradation the Apoftle there ufes, that 
the Head of every Man is Chrifi, and that 
the Head of the Woman is the Man, and 
the Head of Chriji is God ; it being evi- 
dent from the Form of Baptifin, that 
there is no natural Inferiority among the 
Divine Perfbns, but that they are in all 
Things Coequal. The Apoftle, indeed, 

adds, 



! 



APPENDIX. 141 

adds, that the Man is the Glory ofGoT>^ 
and the fVoman the Glory of the Mjh^ 
SCc. But what does he infer from hence ? 
' He fays not a Word of Inequality, oir 
natural Inferiority ; but concludes, that 
a Woman ought to cover her Head, and 
a Man ought not to cover his, and that 
even Nature it J elf teaches us, that if a 
Mail have long Hair it is a Shame unto 
him. Whatever the Apo file's Argu- 
ment proves in this Place, nothing can 
be plainer, than that there is much more 
faid againft the prefent Fafhion of Mens 
wearing long Hair, than 'for that Supre- 
macy they lay claim to. For by all that 
appears in the Text, it is not fo much a 
Law of Nature, that Women fliould 
obey Men, as that Men fhould not wear 
long Hair. Now how can a Chriftian 
Nation allow Falhions contrary to the 
Law of Nature, forbidden by an Apo- 
ftle, and declared by him to be a Sliame 
to Men? Or if Cuftom may make an 
Alteration in one Cafe, it may in another, 
but what then becomes of the Nature 
and Reafon of Things? Befides, the 

Conclufion 



M 



APPENDIX. 

Conclufion the Apoftle draws from his 
Argument concerning Women, viz. that 
they Jhoiild have Power on their Head5\ 
lecaufe of the Angels^ is fo very obfcurc; 
a Text, that that ingenious Paraphraft, 
who pleads fo much for the Natural 
Subje^ion of Women, ingenuoufly con 
feffes, that he does not underftand it, 
Probably it refers to fome Cuftom amon 
the Corinthians y which being wel 
known to them, the Apoftle only hin 
at it, but which we arc ignorant of, an 
therefore apt to miftake him. 'Tis like] 
that the falfe Apoftle whom St. Paa^ 
writes againft, had led Captive fome 
their rich and powerful, but Jtlly Wb> 
men^ who having as mean an Opinio: 
of the Reafon God had given them, ai 
any Deceiver could defirc, did not, lik 
the noble-minded Bereans, fearch th 
Scriptures whether thoje things were Jo^ 
but lazily took up with having Men 
Perfons in admiration, and followed thei: 
Leaders blindfold, the certain Rout t 
Deftrudlion. And it is alfo probable 
that the fame cunning Seducer imploy'd 

thefc 



APPENDIX. 143 

thefc Women to carry on his own Dcfigns, 
and putting them upon what he might 
not think lit to appear in himfelf, made 
them guilty of indecent Behaviour in the 
Church of Corinth. And therefore 
St. 'J^aul thought it neccffary to reprove 
them lb feverely, in order to humble 
them ; but this being done, he takes care 
in the Conclufion to fet the Matter on a 
right Foot, placing the two Sexes on a 
Level, to keep Men, as much as might 
be, from taking thofe Advantages which 
People who have Strength in their Hands, 
are apt to aflume over thofe who can't 
contend with them. For, fays he, iS/<?- 
verthekjs^ or notwithftanding the for- 
mer Argument, the Man is not without 
the Woman^ nor the Woman without the 
Man^ hut all I'hings of God. The Re- 
lation between the two Sexes is mutual, 
and the Dependance reciprocal, both of 
them depending intirely upon God, and 
upon Him only • which, one would 
think, is no great Argimient of the na- 
tural Inferiority of either Sex. 

Our 



144 APPENDIX. 

Our Refle^or is of Opinion, that 
Difpntes of this kind, extending to Hu- 
man Nature in general, and not peculiai 
to thofe to whom the Word of G o d has 
been reveal'd, ought to be decided by 
Natural Reafon only. And, that the 
Holy Scripture ihould not be interefted 
in the prefcnt Controverfy, in which it 
determines nothing, any more than it 
does between the Copermcan and Ptolo* 
mean Syftems. The Defign of thofe 
Holy Books being to make us excellent 
Moral ifts and perfec^t Chriftians, not 
great Philofophers j and being writ for 
the Vulgar as well as for the Learned, 
they are accommodated to the common 
way of Speech and the Ufage of the 
World j in which we have but a fhort 
Probation, fo that it matters not much 
what Part we act, whether of Govern- 
ing or Obeying, provided we perform it 
well with rcfped to the World to come. 

One does not wonder, indeed, that 
when an Adyerfary is droye to a Non- 
plus, 



APPENDIX. 14 

plus, and Reafon declares againft him, 
he flies to Authority, efpecially to Di- 
vine, which is infallible, and therefore 
ought not to be difputed. But Scripture 
is not always on their Side who make 
Parade of it, and through their Skill in 
Languages, and the Tricks of the' 
Schools, wreft it from its genuine Senfe 
to their own Inventions. And fuppo- 
fing, not granting, that it were appa- 
rently to the Womens Diladvantage, no 
fair and generous Adverfary but would 
be afham'd to urge this Advantage : Be- 
caufe Women, without their own Fault, 
are kept in Ignorance of the Original^ 
wanting Languages and other Helps to 
Criticife on the Sacred Text, of which, 
they know no more, than Men are 
pleas'd to impart in their Tranflations< 
In fhort, they (hew their Defire to main- 
tain their Hypothefes, but by no means 
their Reverence to the Sacred Oracles^ 
who engage them in fuch Difputes. 
And therefore, the Blame be theirs, ^\'ho 
have unnecefTarily introduc'd them in 

L the 



146 APPENDIX. 

the prefent Subjed, and who, by faying, 
that the Refle^f'wns were not agreeable 
to Scripture, oblige the Refledor to ftiew, 
that thofe who affirm it muft either mif- 
take her Meaning, or the Senfe of Holy 
Scripture, or both, if they think what 
they fay, and do not find fault meerly 
becaufe they refolve to do fo. For, had 
fhe ever writ any thing contrary to thofe 
facred Truths, ihe would be the firft in 
pronouncing its Condemnation. 

But what fays the Holy Scripture ? 
It fpeaks of Women as in a State of Sub- 
jection, and fo it does of the 'Jews and 
Chriplansy when under the Dominion of 
the Chaldeans and Komdns^ requiring of 
the one as well as of the other, a quiet 
Submiffion to them under whofe Power 
they liv'd. But will any one lay, that 
thefe had a Natural Superiority and Right 
to Dominion? that they had a fuperior 
Underftanding, or any Pre-eminence, 
"except what their greater Strength ac- 
quir'd ? Or, that the other were fub- 

je6led 



APPENDIX. 147 

jecled to their Adveifaries for any other 
Realbn but the Punilhment of their Sins, 
and, in order to their Reformation? Or 
for the Exercife of their Vertue, and be- 
caiife the Order of the World and the 
Good of Society required it ? 

I F Mankind had never Sin'd, Reafbn 
would always have been obeyed, there 
would have been no Struggle for Domi- 
nion, and Brutal Power would not have 
prevailed. But in the lapfed State of 
Mankind, and now, that Men will not 
be guided by their Realbn but by their 
Appetites, and do not what they ought 
but what they can^ the Realbn, or that 
which ftands for it, the Will and Plea- 
furc of the Governor, is to be the Realbn 
of thofe who will not be guided by their 
own, and muft take Place fbr Order's 
fake, although it Hiould not be conform- 
able to riglit Reafon. Nor can there be 
any Society great or little, from Em- 
pires down to private Families, without 
a lait Refort, to determine the Affairs of 
L 1 that 



14? APPENDIX. 

that Society by an irrefiftable Sentence. 
Now unlefs this Supremacy be fix'd 
fomewhere, there will be a perpetual 
Contention about it, fuch is the Love of 
Dominion, and let the Reafon of Things 
be what it may, thofe who have leaft 
Force or Cunning to fupply it, will have 
the Difadvantage. So that fince Women 
are acknowledged to have leaft Bodily 
Strength, their being commanded to 
Obey is in pure Kindncfs to them, and 
for their Quiet and Security, as well as 
for the Exercife of their Vertue. But 
does it follow, that Domeftick Gover- 
nors have more Senfe than their Subjects, 
any more than that other Governors 
hare ? We do not find that any Man 
thinks the worfe of his own Underftand- 
ing, becaufe another has faperior Power; 
or concludes himfelf lefs capable of a 
Poft of Honour and Authority, becaufe 
he is not prefer'd to it. How much 
Time would lie on Mens Hands, how 
empty would the Places of Concoiirfe 
be, and how filent moft Companies, did 

Men 



APPENDIX. 14? 

Men forbear to cenfure their Governors, 
that is, in efFed, to think themfelves 
wifer. Indeed, Government would be 
much more defirable than it is, did it in- 
vert the Pofleflbr with a fuperior Under- 
ftanding as well as Power. And if meer 
Power gives a Right to Rule, there can 
be no fuch Thing as Ufurpation j but a 
Highway-Man, fo long as he has Strength 
to force, has alfo a Right to require our 
Obedience. 

Again, if abfolute Sovereignty be 
not neceffary in a State, how comes it 
to be fo in a Family ? Or if in a Family 
why not in a State ; fince no Reafon 
can be alledged for the one that will not 
hold more ftrongly for the other ? If the 
Authority of the Husband, fo far as it 
extends, is facred and inalienable, why 
not that of the Prince ? The Domeftick 
Sovereign is without Difpute elected, and 
the Stipulations and Contradt are mutual ^ 
is it not then partial in Men to the laft 
Degree, to contend for, and pradife 
L 3 that 



ijo APPENDIX. 

that Arbitrary Dominion in their Fami- 
lies, which they abhor and exclaim 
againft in the State? For if Arbitrary 
Power is evil in it felf, and an improper 
Method of Governing Rational and Free 
Agents, it ought not to be practised any 
where ; nor is it lefs, but rather more 
mifchievmis in Families than in King- 
doms, by how mucli 100,000 Tyrants 
are worfe than one. What though a 
Husband can't deprive a Wife of Life 
without being refponfible to the Law, he 
may, however, do what is much more 
grievous to a generous Mind, render Life 
miferablc, for which fhe has no Redrefs, 
fcaree Pity, which is afforded to every 
other Complainant, it being thought a 
Wife's Duty to fuffer every thing with- 
out Complaint. If all Men are horn 
Free^ how is it that all Women are born 
Slaves ? As they muft be, if the being 
fubjeded to the inconflant^ uncertain^ un^ 
hiown^ arbitrary Wtll of Men, be the 
^erfetl Condition of Slavery ? And, if the 
JLflence of Freedom confifts, as our Ma- 
ilers 



APPENDIX. 151 

ftcrs fay it does, in having a Jlandhig 
Rale to live by ? And why is Slavery fo 
much condemn'd and ftrove againft in 
one Gale, and fo highly applauded, and 
held fo necefTary and fo facred in an- 
other ? 

'Tis true, that God told Eve after ju 
he Fall, that ber Husband fionld Rule 
over her : And fo it is, that he told Efiu 
by the Mouth of J/crac his Father, that 
he fhould Jerve his younger Brother^ and 
Ihould in Time, and when he was ftrong 
enough to do it, break the Tohe from off' 
his Neck. Now, why one Text fhould 
be a Command any more than the other, 
and not both of them be Predidions on- 
ly ; or why the former fhould prove 
Adam's Natural Right to Rule, and 
much lefs every Man's, any more than 
the latter is a Proof of Jacob's Right to 
Rule, and of E/au's to Rebel, one is yet 
to learn ? The Text in both Cafes fore- 
telling what would be j but neither of 
them determining what ought to be, 

L 4 But 



ijj APPENDIX. 

But the Scripture commands iV^ives 
to fubm'it themfehes to their own Huf-^ 
hands. True ^ for which St. Paul gives 
a Myftical Reafon {Eph, v. 22, &c.) 
and St. Peter ^ a Prudential and Charita- 
ble one (i '^et, iii.) but neither of them 
derive that Subjedion from the Law of 
Nature. Nay, St. Paul^ as if he fore-. 
faw and meant to prevent this Plea, giv- 
ing Directions for their Condud to Wo- 
men in general, i T'im. ii. when he comes 
to fpeak of Suhjetilon^ he changes his 
Phrafe from Women^ which denotes the 
whole Sex, to iVoman^ which in the 
New Teftanient is appropriated to a 
Wife, 

As for his not fufFering Women to 
fpeak in the Church, no fober Perfoq 
that I know of pretends to it. That 
learned Paraphraft, indeed, who lays 
fo much Strefs on the Natural Suhje^wn^ 
provided this Prerogative be fecur'd, is 
willing to give up the other. For he 

endca- 



APPENDIX. 15} 

endeavours to prove, that Infpir'd Wo- 
men, as well as Men, us'd to ipeak in 
the Church, and that St. 'T^aul does not 
forbid it, but only takes care that the 
"Women fhould fignify their Subjection 
by wearing a Veil. But the Apoftle is 
his own belt Expofitor, let us therefore 
compare his Precepts with his Practice, 
for he was all of a Piece, and did not 
contradict himfelf Now by this Com- 
parifon we find, that though he forbids 
Women to teach in the Church, and this 
for feveral Prudential Reafons, like thofe 
he introduces with an I give my Ophilou^ 
and now /peak /, not the Lord^ and not 
becaufe of any Law of Nature, or pofi- 
tive Divine Precept, for that the Words 
they are comtmnded (i Cor, xiv. 24.) are 
not in the Original, appears from the 
Italick Character, yet he did not found 
this Prohibition on any fuppos'd want of 
Underftanding in Woman, or of Ability 
to teach ; neither does he confine them 
at all Times to learn In Silence. For the 
eloquent y^pllos^ who was himfelf a 

Teacher, 



154 APPENDIX. 

Teacher, was inftruded by Pr'tfcilhy as 
well as by her Husband jiquila^ and was 
improvM by them both in the Chriftian 
Faith. Nor does St. Paul blame her for 
this, or fiippofe that fhe nfiirfd Atitho- 
rity over that great Mem ; fo far from 
this, that as fhe is always honourably 
nicntion'd in Holy Scripture, fo our 
Apoftle, in his Salutations, Rojn, xvi. 
places her in the Front, even before her 
Husband, giving to her, as well as to 
him, the Noble Title of, his Helper in 
Chr'iji JefiiSy and of one to whom all 
the Churches of the Gentiles had great 
Obligations. 

But, it will be faid perhaps, that in 
I ^im. ii. 13, &c. St. Paul argues for 
the Woman's Subjection from the Rea^ 
fon of Things. To this I anfwer, that 
it muft be confefs'd, that this (accord- 
ing to the vulgar Interpretation) is a 
very obfcure Place, and I fhould be glad 
to fee a Natural, and not a Forc'd In- 
terpretation given of it by thofe who 

take 



APPENDIX. 155 

take it Literally : Whereas if it be taken 
Allegorically, with refped to the Myfti- 
cal Union between Chrift and his Church, 
to which St. Panl frequently accommo- 
dates the Matrimonial Relation, the Dif- 
ficulties vanifh. For the Earthly Adam*% 
being fornid before Rve^ fcems as little 
to prove her Natural Subjeclion to him, 
as the living Creatures, Fifhes, Birds 
and Beads being form'd before them 
both, proves that Mankind mufi: be fub- 
je6l to thcfe Animals. Nor can the 
Apoftle mean that Eve only finned \ or 
that fhe only was Dece'rSd^ for if Adain 
finn'd wilfully and knowingly, he be- 
came the greater Tranfgreflbr. But it 
is very true, that the Second Adam^ the 
Man Chrift Jefus, was fjrjl formd^ and 
then his Spoufe the Church. He was 
not in any refped Deceived, nor does 
file pretend to Infallibility. And from 
this fccond Adam^ promis'd to Eve in 
the Day of our firft Parents Tranfgref^ 
fion, and from Him only, do all their 
Race, Men as well as Women, derive 

their 



1^6 APPENDIX. 

their Hopes of Salvation. Nor is it pro- 
mis'd to either Sex on any other Terms 
befides Perfeverance in Fartby Charltyj 
HoUuefs and Sobriety, 

I F the Learned will not admit of this 
Interpretation, I know not how to con- 
tend with them. For Senfe is a Portion 
that God Himfelf has been pleafed to 
diftribute to both Sexes with an impar- 
tial Hand, but Learning is what Men 
have cngrofs'd to themfelves, and one 
can't but admire their great Improve- 
ments ! For, after doubting whether 
there was fuch a Thing as Truth, and 
after many hundred Years Difputes about 
it, in the laft Century an extraordinary 
Genius arofe, (whom yet, fome are 
pleafed to call a Vifionary) enquir'd 
after it, and laid down the beft Method 
of finding it. Not to the general Li- 
king of the Men of Letters, perhaps, 
becaufe it was wrote in a vulgar Lan- 
guage, and was fo natural and eafy as to 
debafe Truth to common Underftand- 
ings, Ihewing too plainly, that Learn- 



APPENDIX. 157 

ing and true Knowledge are two very 
different Things. " For it often hap- 
" pens (fays that Author) that Women 
" and Children acknowledge the Falfe- 
" hood of thofe Prejudices we contend 
" with, becaufe they do not dare to 
" judge without Examination, and they 
" bring all the Attention they are ca- 
" pable of to what they read. Where- 
" as on the contrary, the Learned con- 
*' tiniie wedded to their own Opinions, 
" becaufe they will not take the Trou- 
*' ble of examining what is contrary to 
" their receivM Doftrines. 

Sciences, indeed, have been in- 
vented and taught long ago, and, as 
Men grew better advis'd, new modelled. 
So that it is become a confidcrable Piece 
of Learning to give an Account of the 
Rife and Progrefs of the Sciences, and 
of the various Opinions of Men concern- 
ing them. But Certainty and Demon- 
ftration are much pretended to in this 
prefent Age, and being obtained in many 

Things, 



1 58 APPENDIX. 

Things, 'tis hoped Men will never Di{l 
pute them away in that which is of great- 
eft Importance, the Way of Salvation. 
And becaiife there is not any thing more 
certain than what is delivered in the 
Oracles of Goo, we come now to con- 
fider what they offer in Favour of our 
Sex. 

Let it be premised, (according to 
the Reaibning of a very ingenious Per- 
fbn in a like Cafe) that one Text for us, 
is more to be regarded than many againft 
us. Becaufe that Ofje being different 
from what Cuflom has eftabliihed, ought 
to be taken with Philofophical Stridnefs • 
whereas the Many being exprels'd ac- 
cording to the vulgar Mode of Speech, 
ought to have no greater Strefs laid on 
them, than that evident Condefcenfion 
will bear. One Place then were fuffi- 
cient, but we have many Inftances 
wherein Holy Scripture confiders Wo- 
men very differently from what they ap- 
pear in the common Prejudices of Man- 
kind. 

The 



APPENDIX. 159 

The World will hardly allow a 
Woman to fay any thing well, unlels, 
as file borrows it from Men, or as affift- 
ed by them : But God Himfelf allows 
that the Daughters of Zelo^hehad fpake 
rlght^ and palfes their Requeft into a 
Law. Confidering how much the Ty- 
ranny, fliall I fay, or the fuperior Force 
of Men, keeps Women from A6ling in 
the World, or doing any thing confider- 
able, and remcmbring withal the Con- 
cifenefs of the Sacred Story, no fmall 
Part of it is bcftow'd in tranfmitting the 
Hiftory of Women, famous in their Ge- 
nerations : Two of the Canonical Books, 
bearing the Names of thofe great Wo- 
men whofe Vertues and Adions are there 
recorded. Ruth being call'd from among 
the Gentiles to be an Anceftor of the 
Meiliah, and E/iher being rais'd up by 
God to be the great Inllrument of the 
Deliverance and Profperity of the JezvlJJ; 
Church. 

Thf 



t6o 



APPENDIX. 



The Charader of Ifaac^ though one 
of the moft blamelefs Men taken Notice 
of in the Old Teftament, muft give 
Place to Rebecca's, whofe Affections are 
more reafonably plac'd than his, her 
Favourite Son being the fame who was 
GoD*s Favourite. Nor was the Blefling 
beftow*d according to his, but to her 
Defire ; fo that if you will not allow, 
that her Command to Jacob fuperfeded 
Ifaac\ to Efau, his Defire to give the 
Blefling to this Son, being evidently an 
Effedt of his Partiality ; you muft at 
leaft grant, that fhe paid greater Defe- 
rence to the Divine Revelation, and for 
this Reafon, at leaft, had a Right to 
oppofe her Husband's Defign; which, 
it feems, Ifaac was fenfible of, when 
upon his Difappointment, he trembled Jo 
exceedingly. And fo much Notice is ta- 
ken even of Rebecca's Nurfe, that we 
have an Account where Ihc died, and 
where Ihe was buried* 



GoS 



APPENDIX. t6i 

G o D is pleas'd to Record it among 
His Favours to the ingrateful Jewsy that 
He fent before them His Servants Mojesy 
jiaron^ and Miriam; who was alfo a 
Prophet efs, and inftructed the Women 
how to bear their Part with Mofes in his 
Triumphal Hymn. Is flie to be blam'd 
for her Ambition ? And is not the High 
Prieft Aaron alio, who has his Share 
in the Reproof as well as in the Crime ? 
nor could fhe have mov'd Sedition if fhe 
had not been a confiderable Pcrfon, 
which appears alfo by the Refped the 
People paid her, in deferring their Jour- 
ney till fhe was ready. 

Where ihall we find a nobler Piece 
of Poetry than Deborah's Song ? Or a 
better and greater Ruler than that re- 
nowned Woman, whofe Government fo 
much exceird that of the former Judges? 
And though fhe had a Husband, fhe her 
fclf judged Ifraely and confequently was 
his Sovereign, of whom we know no 
M more 



\6i APPENDIX. 

more than the Name. Which Inftance, 
as I humbly fuppofe, overthrows the 
Pretence of Natural Inferiority, For it 
is not the bare Relation of a Fad, by 
which none ought to be concluded, un- 
lets it is conformable to a Rule, and to 
the Reafbn of Things : But Deborah's 
Government was conferred on her by God 
Himfelf. Confeqiiently the Sovereignty 
of a Woman is not contrary to the Law 
of Nature ; for the Law of Nature is 
the Law of God, who cannot contra- 
did Himfelf; and yet it was God who 
infpir'd and approved that great Woman, 
raifing her up to Judge and to Deliver 
His People IfraeL 

N o T to infill: on the Courage of that 
valiant Woman, who delivered fhebez 
by flaying the Affailant ; nor upon the 
Preference which God thought fit to 
give to Sampfon's Mother, in fending the 
Angel to her, and not to her Husband, 
.whofe vulgar Fear fhe fo prudently an- 
fwer'd, as plainly Ihews her fuperior 

Under- 



APPENDIX. 1(53 

Underftanding : To pafs over yihigairs 
wife Condud, whereby fhe prcferv'd 
her Family and defer ved David's Ac- 
knowledgments, for rcftraining him from 
doing a ralh and unjuftiiiable Adion ; 
the Holy Penman giving her the Cha- 
rader of a Woman of good Under jlajjd'ing^ 
whilft her Husband has that of a Chur- 
lifli and Foolilh Perfon, and a Son of 
Belial: To lay nothing of the wije fi^O' 
inan (as the Text calls lier) of Tekoah ; 
or of her of y4hel^ who has the fame Epi- 
thet, and who by her Prudence deli- / 
vered the City and appeas'd a dangerous 
Rebellion: Nor of the Queen of 6"/'^^^, 
whofe Journey to hear the Wifdom of 
Solomon^ flievvs her own good Judgment 
and great Share in that excellent Endow- 
ment. Solomon does not think himfelf 
too wife to be inftruded by his Mother, 
nor too great to record her LeflTons, 
which, if he had followed, he might 
have fparcd the Trouble of Repentance, 
and been delivered from a great deal of 
that Vanity he lb deeply regrets. 

M % What 



i6^ APPENDIX. 

What Reafon can be aflign'd why 
the Mothers of the Kings of Judah^ are 
{o frequently noted in thofe very ftiort 
Accounts that are given of their Reigns, 
but the great Refped paid them, or 
perhaps their Influence on the Govern- 
ment, and Share in the Adminiftration ? 
This is not improbable, fince the wic- 
ked Athaliah had Power to carry on her 
Intrigues fo far as to get PofTeflion of the 
Throne, and to keep it for fome Years. 
Neither was there any Neceffity for Afa's 
removing his Mother (or Grandmother) 
from being Qiieen, if this were merely 
Titular, and did not carry Power and 
Authority along with it. And we find 
what Influence Jezahel had in Ifrael^ in- 
deed to her Husband's and her own De- 
ftruftion. 

I T was a Widow-U^oman whom God 
made choice of to fuftain his Prophet 
"Elijah at Zarephah, And the Hiftory 
of the Shmmmite is a noble Inftance of 
the Account that is made of Women in 

Holy 



APPENDIX. 1(55 

Holy Scripture. For whether it was not 
the Cuftom in Shanem for the Husband 
to dictate, or whether her's was con- 
fcious of her fuperior Vertue, or what- 
ever was the Reafon, we find it is ihe 
who governs, dwellhig with great Ho- 
nour and Satisfaclion amo?iz her own Peo- 
fie. Which Happincfs fhe underftood 
fo well, and was fo far from a trouble- 
ibme Ambition, that fhe defires no Re- 
commendation to the King or Captain of 
the Hoji^ when the Prophet offered it, 
being already greater than they could 
make her. The Text calls her a Great 
WotnaUy whilft her Husband is hardly 
taken Notice of, and this, no other- 
wife, than as performing the Office of a 
Bailiff. It is her Piety and Hofpitality 
that are Recorded, She invites the Pro- 
phet to her Houfe • who converfes vv ith, 
and is entertained by her. She gives 
her Husband no Account of htr Affairs 
any further, than to tell him her Defigns, 
that he may fee them executed. And 
when he defires to know the Reafon of 
M 3 her 



x66 APPENDIX. 

her Condud, all the Anfwer fhe affords 
isy fVel/, or, as the Margin has it from 
the Hebrew^ '^eace. Nor can this be 
thought aflbming, fince it is no more 
than what the Prophet encourages, for 
all his Addreffes are to her^ he takes no 
Notice of her Husband. His Benefits arc 
conferr'd on her^ 'tis Jhe and her Houje- 
hold whom he warns of a Famine, and 
'tis Jhe who Appeals to the King for the 
Reftitution of her Hotife and Land. I 
would not infer from hence, that Wo- 
txjen, generally fpeaking, ought to go- 
vern in their Families when they have 
a Husband ; but I think this Inftance 
and Example is a fufficient Proof, that 
if by Cuftom or Contracl, or the Laws 
of the Country, or Birth-right, (as in 
the Cafe of Sovereign Princelfes) they 
have the fupreme Authority, it is no 
Ufurpation, nor do they ad contrary to 
Holy Scripture, nor confequcntly to 
the Law of Nature. For they are no 
where, that I know of, forbidden to 
claim their juft Right: The Apoftle, 

'tis 



A P P E N D I X. i($7 

*tis true, would not have them ufiirp 
Authority, where Cuftom and the Law 
of the ftrongeft had brought them into 
Subjection, as it has in thefe Parts of the 
World. Though in remoter Regions, 
if Travellers rightly inform us, the Suc- 
ceffion to the Crown is intail'd on the 
Female Line. 

God Himfelf, who is no Refpe^er of 
Perfous^ with -whom there is neither Bond 
nor Free, Mule nor Female , but they are 
all one in Chrift J ejus, did not deny 
Women that Divine Gift the Spirit of 
Prophecy, neither under the Jevjijh nor 
Chriflian Difpenfation. We have nam*d 
two great ProphetefTes already, Miriam 
and Deborah ; and befides other Inftan- 
ces, Huldah the Prophetefs was fuch an 
Oracle, that the good King Jojjah^ that 
great Pattern of Vertuc, fends even the 
High Prieft himfelf to confult her, and 
to receive Directions from her in the 
moft arduous Affairs. It fjall come to 
fafsy faith the Lord, that I will pour out 
M 4 my 



i6S APPENDIX. 

fny Spirit upon all Flefh^ and your Sons and 
your Daughters Jhall Prophejy^ which 
was accordingly fulfiUM by the Million 
of the Holy Ghoft on the Day of Pente^ 
CO ft, as St. Peter tells us. And, befides 
others, there is mention of four Daugh- 
ters of Philipy Virgins, who did Prophefy. 
For, as in the Old, fo in the New T^ejia^ 
ment. Women make a confiderable Fi- 
gure ; the Holy Virgin receiving the 
greateft Honour that Human Nature is 
capable of, when the Son of God vouch- 
fafed tQ be her Son, and to derive his 
Humanity from her only. And if it is 
a greater Bleffing to hear the JVord of 
God and keep it, who are more confider- 
able for their Affiduity in this, than the 
Female Difciples of our Lord? Mary 
being Exemplary, and receiving a noble 
Encomium from Him, for her Choice of 
the better Part. 

I T would be thought tedious to enu- 
merate all the excellent Women mention- 
ed in the New "Jtejiament^ whofe humble 

Penitence 



APPENDIX. 169 

Penitence and ardent Love, as Magda^ 
lens ; their lively Faith and holy Inipor- 
tiMity, as the Syrophenkians ; extraor- 
dinary Piety and Uprightnefs, as EUza- 
heth's'j Hofpitality, Charity and Dili- 
gence, as Martha*Sy Tabitha's^ &c, (fee 
St. LukeYin.) • frequent and ajfTiduous De- 
votions and Aufterities, 2Lsy^mias'^ Con- 
ilaney and Courage, Perfeverance and 
ardent Zeal, as that of the Holy Wo- 
men who attended our Lord to His 
Crofs, vv^hen His Difciples generally for- 
fook, and the moft Courageous had de- 
nied Him ; are Recorded for our Exam- 
ple. Their Love was ftronger than 
Death, it followed our Saviour into the 
Grave. And, as a Reward, both the 
Angel, and even the Lord Himfelf, 
appears firll to them, and fends them to 
preach the great Article of the Refur- 
redion to the very Apoftles, who being, 
as yet, under the Power of the Prejudices 
of their Sex, efteem'd the Holy \\ o- 
mens fVords as idle 7'aks^ and believed them 
not* 

Some 



1/0 



APPENDIX. 



Some Men will have it, that the 
Reafon of our Lord's appearing firft 
to the Women, was, their being leaft 
able to keep a Secret ; a witty and maf- 
culine Remark, and wonderfully Reve- 
rent ! But not to difpute whether thofc 
Women were Blabs or no, there are many 
Inftances in Holy Scripture, of Women 
who did not betray the Confidence re- 
pos'd in them. Thus Rahaby though 
formerly an ill Woman, being converted 
by the Report of thofe Miracles, which, 
though the Ifraelltes faw^ yet they he- 
Iteved not tn God, nor put their T^rufi in 
hts Word^ She acknowledges the God of 
Heaven, and, as a Reward of her faith- 
ful Service, in concealing J-ofhim's Spies, 
is, with her Family, exempted from the 
Ruin of her Country, and alfo, has the 
Honour of being named in the Meffiah'^ 
Genealogy, Mkhal^ to fave David's 
Life, expofes her felf to the Fury of a 
Jealous and Tyrannical Prince. A Girl 
was trufted by David's grave Counfel- 

lors 



APPENDIX. 171 

lors to convey him Intelligence in his 
Son's Rebellion; and when a Lad had 
found it out, and blab'd it to Ahjdom^ 
the King's Friends confiding in the Pru- 
dence and Fidelity of a Woman, were 
fecur'd by her. When our Lord efca- 
ped from the Jews^ he truftcd Himfelf 
in the Hands of Martha and Mary. So 
does St. Peter with another Mary^ when 
the Angel delivered him from Herod^ the 
Damfel Rhoda too, was acquainted with 
the Secret. More might be faid, but one 
would think here is enough to fhew, 
that whatever other great and wife Rea- 
fons Men may have for defpifing Wo- 
men, and keeping them in Ignorance 
and Slavery, it can't be from their having 
learnt to do fo in Holy Scripture. The 
Bible is for, and not againft us, and can- 
not without great Violence done to it, 
be urg'd to our Prejudice. 

However, there are ftrong and 
prevalent Reafons which demonftrate the 
Superiority and Pre-eminence of the Men. 

For 



172 APPENDIX. 

For in the firft Place, Boys have much 
Time and Pains, Care and Goft beftow'd 
on their Education, Girls have little or 
none. The former are early initiated in 
the Sciences, are made acquainted with 
antient and modern Difcoveries, they 
lludy Books and Men, have all imagi- 
nable Encouragement^ not only Fame, 
a dry Reward now a-days, but alfo 
Title, Authority, Power, and Riches 
themfelves, which purchafe all Things, 
are the Reward of their Improvement. 
The latter are reftrain'd, frown'd upon, 
and beat, not /or, but from the Mufes ; 
Laughter and Ridicule, that never-fail- 
ing Scare-Grow, is fet up to drive them 
from the Tree of Knowledge. But if, 
in fpite of all Difficulties Nature prevails, 
and they can't be kept fo ignorant as 
their Mafters would have them, they are 
llar'd upon as Monfters, cenfur'd, en- 
vied, and every way difcouraged, or, at 
the beft, they have the Fate the Pro- 
verb alTigns them, Fertue is prats' d and 
fiarvd. And therefore, fince the coarfeft 

Ma- 



APPENDIX. 175 

Materials need the moft Curing, as 
every Workman can inform you, and 
the worft Ground the moft elaborate Cul- 
ture, it undeniably follows, that Mens 
Underftandings are fuperior to Womens 
for, after many Years Study and Expe- 
rience, they become wife and learned, 
and Women are not Born fo ! 

Again, Men are pofTefTcd of all 
Places of Power, Truft and Profit, they 
make Laws and exercile the Magiftracy, 
not only the Iharpeft Sword, but even 
all the Swords and Blunderbufles are 
theirs, which by the ftrongeft Logick in 
the World, gives them the beft Title to 
every Thing they pleafe to claim as their 
Prerogative : Who Ihall contend with 
them ? Immemorial Prefcription is on 
their Side in thefe Parts of the World, 
antient Tradition and modern Ufage ! 
Our Fathers, have all along, both taught 
and practifed Superiority over the weaker 
Sex, and confequently Women are by 
Nature inferior to Men, as was to be de- 

monftrated. 



174 APPENDIX. 

monftrated. An Argument which muft 
be acknowledged unanfwerable ; for, as 
well as I love my Sex, I will not pretend 
a Reply iofuch Demonftration ! 

Only let me beg to be informed, to 
whom we poor Fatherlefs Maids, and 
Widows who have loft their Mafters, 
ow^e Subje6Hon ? It can't be to all Men 
in general, unlefs all Men were agreed 
to give the fame Commands j Do wc 
then fall as Strays, to the firft who finds 
us ? By the Maxims of fome Men, and 
the Conduft of fome Women one would 
think fo* But whoever he be that thus 
happens to become our Mafter, if he al- 
lows us to be reafonable Creatures, and 
does not meerly Compliment us with 
that Title, fince no Man denies our Rea- 
dincfs to ufe our Tongues, it would 
tend, I Ihould think, to our Matter's 
Advantage, and therefore he may pleafe 
to be advis'd to teach us to improve our 
Reafon. But if Reafon is only allowed 
us by way of Raillery, and the fecret 

Maxim 



APPENDIX. 175 

Maxim is, that we have none, or little 
more than Brutes, 'tis the belt way to 
confine us with Chain and Block to the 
Chimney-Corner, which, probably, might 
fave the Eftates of fome Families ancj 
the Honour of others. 

I Do not propofe this to prevent a 
Rebellion, for Women are not fo well 
united as to form an Infurredion. They 
are for the moft part wife enough to love 
their Chains, and to difcern how very 
becomingly they fit. They think as 
humbly of themfclves as their Mafters 
can wifh, with refped to the other Sex, 
but in regard to their own, they have a 
Spice of Mafculine Ambition ; every one 
would Lead, and none would Follow. 
Both Sexes being too apt to Envy, and 
too backward in Emulating, and take 
more Delight in detrading from their 
Neighbour's Vertue, than in improving 
their own. And therefore, as to thofe 
Women who find themfelves born for 
•Slavery, and are fo fenfible of their own 
2. Mean- 



\r6 APPENDIX. 

Mcannefs, as to conclude it impoflible iQ 
attain to any thing excellent, fince they 
are, or ought to be beft acquainted with 
their own Strength and Genius, She's a- 
Fool who would attempt their Delive- 
rance or Improvement. No, let them 
enjoy the great Honour and Felicity of 
their tame, fubmiilive and depending 
Temper ! Let the Men applaud, and let 
them giory in this wonderful Humility f 
Let them receive the Flatteries and Gri- 
maces of the other Sex, liveunenvied by 
their own, and be as much belov'd as 
one fuch Woman can afford to love an- 
other! Let them enjoy the Glory of 
treading in the Footfteps of their Prede- 
ceflbrs, and of having the Prudence to 
avoid that audacious Attempt of foaring 
beyond their Sphere ! Let them Huf^ 
wife or Play, Drefs, and be pretty en- 
tertaining Company ! Or, which is bet- 
> ter, relieve the Poor to eafe their own 
Compaffions, read pious Books, fay their 
Prayers, and go to Church, becaufe they 
have been taught and us'd to do fo, 

without 



APPENDIX. 177 

without being able to give a better Rca- 
fbn for their Faith and Pradice! Let 
them not by any means afpire at being 
Women of Underftanding, becaufe no 
Man can endure a Woman of Superior 
Scnfe, or would treat a reafonable Wo- 
man civilly, but that he thinks he ftands 
on higher Ground, and,- that ilie is ib 
wife as to make Exceptions in his Fa- 
vour, and to take her Mcafures by his 
Diredions ; they may pretend to Senfe, 
indeed, fince meer Pretences only render 
one the more ridiculous ! Let them, in 
fliort, be what is call'd very Women, 
for this is mofl acceptable to all Ibrts of 
Men- or let th^m aim at the Title of 
good devout Women, fince fome Men can 
bear with this ; but let them not judge 
of the Sex by their own Scantling: For 
the great Author of Nature and Foun- 
tain of all Perfection, never defignM 
that the Mean and Imperfed, but that 
the moft Compleat and Excellent of His 
Creatures in every Kind, fhould be the 
Standard to the reft. 

N To 



,78 APPENDIX. 

T o conclude ; If that Great Queen 
who has fubdiied the Proud, and made 
the pretended Invincible more than once 
fly before her ; who has Refcued an Em- 
pire^ Reduced a Kingdom, Conquer'd 
Provinces in as little Time almoft as one 
can Travel them, and feems to have 
chained Victory to her Standard ; who 
difpofes of Crowns, gives Laws and 
Liberty to Europe, and is the chief In- 
ftrument in the Hand of the Almighty, 
to pull down and to fet up the great 
Men of the Earth ; who conquers every 
where for others, and no where for her 
felf but in the Hearts of the Conquer'd, 
who are of the Number of thofe who 
reap the Benefit of her Triumphs ; whilft 
ihe only reaps for her felf the Lawrels 
of difinterefted Glory, and the Royal 
Pleafure of doing Heroically j if this 
Glory of her own Sex, and Envy of 
the other, will not think we need, or 
does not hold us worthy of, the Pro- 
tedion of her ever vidorious Arms, and 

Men 



APPENDIX. 179 

Men have not the Gratitude, for her fake 
at leaft, to do Jufticc to her Sex, who 
has been fuch a univerfal Bcnefadrefs to 
theirs : Adieu to the Liberties, not of 
this or that Nation or Region only, but 
of the Moiety of Mankind ! To all the 
great Things that Women might per- 
form, inlpir'd by her Example, encou- 
raged by her Smiles, and fupported by 
her Power ! To their Difcovery of new 
Worlds for the Excrcife of her Good- 
nefs, new Sciences to publifh her Fame, 
and reducing Nature it felf to a Sub- 
jedion to her Empire! To their deflroy- 
ing thofe worft of Tyrants Impiety and 
Immorality, which dare to ftalk about 
even in her own Dominions, and to de- 
vour Souls almoft within View of her 
Throne, leaving a Stench behind them 
Icarce to be correded even by the In- 
cenfe of her Devotions ! To the Wo- 
men's tracing a new Path to Honour, 
in which none fhall walk but fuch as 
fcorn to Cringe in order to Rife, and 
who are Proof both againft giving and 
N 2 receiving 



i8o APPENDIX. 

receiving Flattery I In a Word, to thofe 
Halcyon, or, if you will, Millennium 
Days, in which the Wolf and the Lamb 
fhall feed together, and a Tyrannous 
Domination, which Nature never meant, 
fhall no longer render ufclefs, if not 
hurtful, the Induftry and Underftand- 
ings of half Mankind! 



FINIS. 




BOOKS lately Trinted for, and 
Sold hy William Parker. 
at the King'5 Head in St, Paul's 
Church- Yard. 



FOLIO. 

A Compleat Hillory of Evgland, to the Death of 
■"■ King iVilliavi IK. with Iar2;e Notes. Colleded 
by the late Biiliop Kennet. VVith the Effigies of all 
the Kings, from the Originals : Engraven by the bcft 
Maftei-s.' -x Vols. 

Tuifindorf^ Law of Nature and Nations \ in eight 
Books. Done into EngHjb by Bafd Kcnvet^ D. D. 
To which are added, all the large Notes by Mr. 
Barbeyrac. TheFourdi Edition, carefully correcfted. 

Guillims Difplay of Heraldry : The iixth Edition, 
improv'di with large Additions of many hundred 
Coats of Arms, under their refpe6live Bearings; 
with good Audiorities from the Ajhvioleaii Library, 
Sir George Macken7.te^ c^-c. 

The Natural Hiftory of Ncrthamptonjljire \ with 
fomc Account of the Antiquides. To which is an- 
ncx'd, A Tranfcript of Doomfday-Book, fo far as it re- 
lates to that County. By JoLvi Moreton, M. A. Rec- 
tor of Oxe?ido?i in the fame Coimty, and F. R. S. 

The Cambridge Concordance to the Holy Scrip- 
tures: Together with the Books of Apocrypha-^ and 
the various Readings bodi of Texts and iVl.irgin, in 
a more exa6t Method than has hitherto been extant. 
The fifth Edition, very accurately corrected. 

The Works of the famous Nicholas Machiavel) 
Citizen and Secretary of Florence ; newly and faith- 
fully Tranflared into Englijh. The Third Edition, 
carefully corrected. 

The Works of the moft' exemplary Chriftian Mr. 
IVilliam Allen-t conliiling of thirteen dilUnd Tra^s 

on 



Booh Sold Jj; W. Parke SL. 

on feveral Subjeds. With a Sermon preached at his 
Funeral by Bifhop Kidder : To which is prefix'd, a 
Preface concerning the Autlior and his Writings j by 
John Williams^ late Bifhop of Chichefter. 

^U A R TO. 

Common-Place Book to the Bible. 

LittletoTi's Didionary. 

Religion of Nature delineated. 

Tour ?ief oris compleat Herbal, 39 Numbers, to be 
continued. Price i s. each. 

The Hiftory and Antiquities, Ecclefiaftical and 
Civil, of the Ille of Thanet in Kent. By J. Leivis, 
M. A. 

The Hiftory and Antiquities of the Abby and Church 
of Fever/ban? in Kent:, of the adjoining Priory of 
T>avhigton and Ma'rfon-Dieu of Ofpringe, and Parifh 
oiBoSion Suhtus le Bleyne^ &cc. By _/. Lewis, M. A- 

OCTAVO and TWELVES. 

An Anfwer to the DiOTenters Pleas for Separation : 
Or, an Abridgment of the London Cafes. Wherein 
the Subftance of ihofe Books is digefted into one 
fhort and plain Difcourfe. The 6th Edition. By 
Thomas Bennet, D. D. late Vicar of St. Giles\ Crip- 
plegate. 

Bifliop Bull's Sermons, with hJs Life. By Mr. 
Helfon., in 4 ^'^ols. 

The Book of Pfalms made Et for the Clofet ; with 
Colledls and Prayers out of the Liturgy of the Church 
of England, &c. particularly adapted, with Tides to 
each Pfalm. 

Dr. Comber'' s fliort Difcourfes upon the whole 
Common-Prayer, defigned to inform the Judgment, 
and excite the Devotion of luch as daily ufe the 
fame. The Fourth Edition. 

Civil Policy, a Trearife concerning the Nature of 
Government. Wherein the Reafons of the great Di- 
verfity to be obferved in the Cuftoms, Manners, 
and Ufages of Nations, arc Hiftoricallv explained, 
and Remarks made upon the Changes of our Englifh 

Confti- 



Books Sold hy W. ]? AtiKEK, 

Conftitutions, and the different Meafures of our fe- 
veral Kings. By a Dodtor of Phyfick. 

Bifhop CitmherlancTs Sajtchoniatbo's Phanician Hif- 
tory. 

— — Origines Gentium Aiitiquijttione : Or, At- 
tempts for Difcovering the Times of the firft Planting 
of Nations . In feveral Trails. 
N. B. Thefe two Pieces of Bifhop CumberJaiuT^-, con- 
tain a Confutation of the new Notion of Chrono- 
logy advanced by Sir Ifaac Kewtou. 
Drel'mcourfs Chriftian's Defence againft the Fears 
of Death ^ with fealbnable Direftions how to prepare 
our feh'es to Die well. The 12th Edition. 

A Defence of Dioccfin Epilcopacy, in Anfwer to a 
Book of Dr. David Clarkfonj lately publillied, intitu- 
led Frimitive Epifcopacy. By H. Maurice^ D. D. The 
Second Edition. 

Sir Joh>i F/tf^er's Treatife of the Afthma. -^d Edit. 
The Frauds of the RomiJJ} Monks and Priefts, fee 
forth in eight Letters. The 5th Edition. With Ob- 
fervations on a Journey to Naples: Wherein the 
Frauds of the Romijb Monks and Priefts are further 
difcovered. Lately written by a Gentleman in his 
Journey to Ifalyy and publiflicd for the Benefit of the 
Public k. 2 Vols. 

The Gentleman inftrufted in the Condud: of a vir- 
tuous and happy Life. In Three Parts. W^ritten for 
the Inftrudion of a young Nobleman. To which is 
added: A Word to the Ladies. By way of Supple- 
ment to the Firft Part. 

The Gardeners and Florifts Di^flionary : Or, A com- 
pleat Syftem of Hotticulrure. In 2 Vols. By Philip 
Miller J Gardener of the Botanick Garden at Chelfea. 
The genuine Ufe and Neccftity of the t^^'o Sacra- 
ments : Namely, Baptifm and the Lord's Supper ; 
without Obligations frequently to receive the latter. 

The Hiftoiy of E7?gland, faithfully extracted from 
authentick Records, approved Manufcripts, and the 
moft celebrated Hiftories of this Kingdom, in all Lan- 
guages, whether Ecclefiaftical or Civil, with the Effi- 
gc.5 of the Kings and Queens. 5th Edition. 2 Vols. 

Olyff's Pradical Expofition on the Church Cate- 
cliifm. 2 Vols. 

Lawful- 



Booh Sold by W. Parke r. 

Lav/fulnefi of Infant Baptifm improv'd from Scrip- 
ture: With the Right that the Infants of Chriftian Pa- 
rents have to be Baptized. Wherein alfo Mr, Gales 
Refledions on Dr. Walh Hiftory of Infant Baptifm 
are examined and refuted, fo far as they came in the 
Way of this Difcourfe j and all the Objedtions and 
Arguments of other Antipaedobaptifts, that are of any 
Weight, are taken off. By the Rev. Mr. Oweuy 
Vicar of Jford in SnJJex. 

Bilhop Potter's Dilcourfe of Church Government ; 
wherein the Rights of the Church, and the Supre- 
macy of Chi-iitian Princes are vindicated and ad_ 
jufted. Third Edition. 

Pious Communicant : Containing whatever is ne- 
ceffary to perfuade and prepare us for that and all 
other Duties of Devotion, and prevent all Scruples 
concerning them, (d^'c. 

Fatlier ^ef?iels Moral Reflexions upon every 
Verfe of the New Teftament, in order to make the 
Reading of it more profitable, and the Meditation 
more eafy. In four Vols. 

N. B. Thofe Gentlemen that have the Firft and 
Second Volumes, are deured fpeedUy to fend 
for the Third and Fourth, othei-wife they will 
find it difiicult to com pleat them, there not be- 
ing fo many Printed of the two laft as of the 
former Volumes. 

Reflexions upon Learning ; v,'herein is fnewn the 
Infufficiency thereof, in its feveral Particulars, in 
order to evince the Ufefulnefs and NeceiTity of Re- 
velation. The fixch Edition, By a Gentleman. 

The Scripture Do6trine of Chriffc's Divinity : or, 
The adorable Nature, voluntar}' Subjedion, and 
neceffary Supremacy of the Son of God, confider'd : 
In fix Sermons j preach'd on leveral Occafions. By 
Sam. yohnfon^ M. A. Vicar of Great Torringtoni 
Redior of Little Tvrrivgton. 

Where may be had Gratis-^ a Catalogue of Books 
(being Part of the Stock of two Bookfellers who 
have lately left off Trade) which are to be fold 
very cheap unbound till Michaelmas next, the 
Prices printed in the Catalogue afterward, at the 
former Prices, 



% 



Due 



:f' 



392.5 A853S 



440440 



\ 



